Commission Regulation (EC) No 553/2005
providing for a further allocation of import rights under Regulation (EC) No 1081/1999 for bulls, cows and heifers other than for slaughter of certain Alpine and mountain breeds
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1254/1999 of 17 May 1999 on the common organisation of the market in beef and veal [1],
Having regard to Commission Regulation (EC) No 1081/1999 of 26 May 1999 opening and providing for the administration of tariff quotas for imports of bulls, cows and heifers other than for slaughter of certain Alpine and mountain breeds, repealing Regulation (EC) No 1012/98 and amending Regulation (EC) No 1143/98 [2], and in particular Article 9(3) thereof,
The quantities referred to in Article 9(1) of Regulation (EC) No 1081/1999 shall be:
- 3711 head for serial number 09.0001,
- 3712 head for serial number 09.0003.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 12 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 554/2005
fixing Community producer and import prices for carnations and roses with a view to the application of the arrangements governing imports of certain floricultural products originating in Jordan
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EEC) No 4088/87 of 21 December 1987 fixing conditions for the application of preferential customs duties on imports of certain flowers originating in Cyprus, Israel, Jordan, Morocco and the West Bank and the Gaza Strip [1], and in particular Article 5(2)(a) thereof,
(1) Under Articles 2(2) and 3 of Regulation (EEC) No 4088/87, Community import and producer prices are fixed each fortnight for uniflorous (bloom) carnations, multiflorous (spray) carnations, large-flowered roses and small-flowered roses and apply for two-week periods. Under Article 1(b) of Commission Regulation (EEC) No 700/88 of 17 March 1988 laying down detailed rules for the application of the arrangements for the import into the Community of certain floricultural products originating in Cyprus, Israel, Jordan, Morocco and the West Bank and the Gaza Strip [2], those prices are determined for two-week periods on the basis of weighted prices provided by the Member States.
(2) Those prices should be fixed immediately so the customs duties applicable can be determined.
(3) Following the accession of Cyprus to the European Union on 1 May 2004, it is no longer necessary to fix import prices for Cyprus.
(5) The Commission must adopt these measures in between the meetings of the Management Committee for Live Plants and Floriculture Products,
The Community producer and import prices for uniflorous (bloom) carnations, multiflorous (spray) carnations, large-flowered roses and small-flowered roses as referred to in Article 1 of Regulation (EEC) No 4088/87 shall be as set out in the Annex hereto for the period from 13 to 26 April 2005.
This Regulation shall enter into force on the day of its publication in the Official Journal of the European Union.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Council Regulation (EC) No 555/2005
on the conclusion of the Protocol defining for the period 1 January 2004 to 31 December 2006 the tuna fishing opportunities and the financial contribution provided for in the Agreement between the European Economic Community and the Democratic Republic of Madagascar on fishing off Madagascar
THE COUNCIL OF THE EUROPEAN UNION,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community, and in particular Article 37 in conjunction with Article 300(2) and the first subparagraph of Article 300(3) thereof,
Having regard to the proposal from the Commission,
Having regard to the opinion of the European Parliament [1],
(1) Under the Agreement between the European Economic Community and the Democratic Republic of Madagascar on fishing off Madagascar [2], the two parties conducted negotiations to determine the amendments or additions to be made to the Agreement at the end of the period of application of the Protocol thereto.
(2) As a result of those negotiations, a new Protocol defining for the period 1 January 2004 to 31 December 2006 the fishing opportunities and the financial contribution provided for in that Agreement was initialled on 8 September 2003.
(3) It is in the Community’s interest to approve that Protocol.
(4) The method of allocating the fishing opportunities among the Member States should be defined on the basis of the traditional allocation of fishing opportunities under the Fisheries Agreement,
The Protocol defining for the period 1 January 2004 to 31 December 2006 the tuna fishing opportunities and the financial contribution provided for in the Agreement between the European Economic Community and the Democratic Republic of Madagascar on fishing off Madagascar is hereby approved on behalf of the Community.
The text of the Protocol is attached to this Regulation.
The fishing opportunities provided for in the Protocol shall be allocated among the Member States as follows:
If licence applications from these Member States do not cover all the fishing opportunities laid down by the Protocol, the Commission may take into consideration licence applications from any other Member State.
Member States whose vessels fish under this Protocol are obliged to notify the Commission of the quantities of each stock taken in the Malagasy fishing zone in accordance with the arrangements laid down in Commission Regulation (EC) No 500/2001 of 14 March 2001 laying down detailed rules for the application of Council Regulation (EEC) No 2847/93 on the monitoring of catches taken by Community fishing vessels in third country waters and on the high seas [3].
The President of the Council is hereby authorised to designate the persons empowered to sign the Protocol in order to bind the Community.
This Regulation shall enter into force on the third day following that of its publication in the Official Journal of the European Union.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 556/2005
establishing the standard import values for determining the entry price of certain fruit and vegetables
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Commission Regulation (EC) No 3223/94 of 21 December 1994 on detailed rules for the application of the import arrangements for fruit and vegetables [1], and in particular Article 4(1) thereof,
(1) Regulation (EC) No 3223/94 lays down, pursuant to the outcome of the Uruguay Round multilateral trade negotiations, the criteria whereby the Commission fixes the standard values for imports from third countries, in respect of the products and periods stipulated in the Annex thereto.
(2) In compliance with the above criteria, the standard import values must be fixed at the levels set out in the Annex to this Regulation,
The standard import values referred to in Article 4 of Regulation (EC) No 3223/94 shall be fixed as indicated in the Annex hereto.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 13 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 557/2005
prohibiting fishing for Northern prawns by vessels flying the flag of a Member State other than Estonia, Latvia, Lithuania or Poland
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EEC) No 2847/93 of 12 October 1993 establishing a control system applicable to the common fisheries policy [1], and in particular Article 21(3) thereof,
(1) Council Regulation (EC) No 27/2005 of 22 December 2004 fixing for 2005 the fishing opportunities and associated fishing conditions for certain fish stocks and groups of fish stocks, applicable in Community waters and, for Community vessels, in waters where limitations in catch are required, lays down quotas for Northern prawns for 2005 [2].
(2) In order to ensure compliance with the provisions relating to the quantity limits on catches of stocks subject to quotas, the Commission must fix the date by which catches made by vessels flying the flag of a Member State are deemed to have exhausted the quota allocated.
(3) According to the information sent to the Commission, catches of Northern prawns in the waters of the NAFO area 3L by vessels flying the flag of a Member State or registered in a Member State other than Estonia, Latvia, Lithuania or Poland have reached the quota for 2005. The Community has prohibited fishing for this stock from 24 February 2005. This date should be adopted in this Regulation also,
Catches of Northern prawns in the waters of NAFO area 3L by vessels flying the flag of a Member State or registered in a Member State other than Estonia, Latvia, Lithuania or Poland are deemed to have exhausted the quota for 2005.
Fishing for Northern prawns in the waters of NAFO area 3L by vessels flying the flag of a Member State or registered in a Member State other than Estonia, Latvia, Lithuania or Poland is hereby prohibited, as are the retention on board, transhipment and landing of this stock caught by the above vessels after the date of application of this Regulation.
This Regulation shall enter into force on the day following that of its publication in the Official Journal of the European Union.
It shall apply from 24 February 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 558/2005
amending Regulations (EEC) No 3846/87 establishing an agricultural product nomenclature for export refunds and (EC) No 174/1999 laying down special detailed rules for the application of Council Regulation (EEC) No 804/68 as regards export licences and export refunds in the case of milk and milk products
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 of 17 May 1999 on the common organisation of the markets in milk and milk products [1], and in particular Article 31(14) thereof,
(1) Commission Regulation (EEC) No 3846/87 [2], on the basis of the Combined Nomenclature, establishes an agricultural product nomenclature for export refunds.
(2) The refund nomenclature provides for cheeses to be eligible for an export refund if they meet minimum requirements as regards milk dry matter and milk fat. A type of cheese produced in some new Member States may meet those necessary requirements but may not benefit from a refund since it is not covered by the present classification system of the export refund nomenclature. Given the importance of that cheese for the dairy industry, trade and milk producers involved, it is appropriate to add a product code under an "other cheeses" position enabling that cheese to be classified under the export refund nomenclature.
(3) The quantities for which export licences are requested in the product category "cheeses" are continually exceeding the profile of the export limits imposed on the Community in the framework of the Agreement on Agriculture following the Uruguay Round of Multilateral Trade Negotiations. The additional export licences which will be applied for under the newly created position will further increase the pressure on the category.
(4) Article 3 of Commission Regulation (EC) No 174/1999 [3] provides that no refund shall be granted on exports of cheese where the free-at-frontier price prior to application of the refund in the Member State of export is less than EUR 230 per 100 kilograms. Cheese falling within code 0406 90 33 9919 of the nomenclature for refunds is exempt from this provision. It is appropriate in these circumstances and given the high level of demand for export licences for cheeses to apply this provision to all cheeses without exception.
(5) Footnote 10 of Sector 9 of Annex I of Regulation (EEC) No 3846/87, applicable to grated, powdered and processed cheeses, states that added non-lactic matter will not be taken into account for the purpose of calculating the refund. It is appropriate to extend this provision to all cheeses and to better describe the non-lactic matter concerned. It may not be possible for the exporter and even more difficult for the competent authorities to determine the weight of these matters. It is therefore appropriate to reduce the refund by a standard amount.
(6) The refund is granted on the net weight of the cheeses. Some confusion may exist in cases where cheeses are contained in an envelope of paraffin, ash or wax or wrapped in a film of plastic. It is appropriate to provide that such packing are not a part of the net weight of the product for the purpose of calculating the refund. It may not be possible for the exporter and for the competent authorities, as regards the plastic film, the paraffin and the ash, to determine the weight of such materials. It is therefore suitable to reduce the refund by a standard amount.
(7) Regulations (EEC) No 3846/87 and (EC) No 174/1999 should be amended accordingly.
(8) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the Management Committee for Milk and Milk Products,
Annex I to Regulation (EEC) No 3846/87 is amended in accordance with the Annex to this Regulation.
In Article 3 of Regulation (EC) No 174/1999 the fourth paragraph is deleted.
This Regulation shall enter into force on the day following its publication in the Official Journal of the European Union.
It shall apply on export licences applied for from 27 May 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 559/2005
on initiating an investigation concerning the possible circumvention of anti-dumping measures imposed by Council Regulation (EC) No 2074/2004 on imports of certain ring binder mechanisms originating in the People’s Republic of China by imports of certain ring binder mechanisms consigned from Lao People’s Democratic Republic, whether declared as originating in Lao People’s Democratic Republic or not and making such imports subject to registration
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 384/96 of 22 December 1995 on protection against dumped imports from countries not members of the European Community [1] (the basic Regulation), and in particular Articles 13(3), 14(3) and 14(5) thereof,
After having consulted the Advisory Committee,
(1) The Commission has received a request pursuant to Article 13(3) of the basic Regulation to investigate the possible circumvention of the anti-dumping measures imposed on imports of certain ring binder mechanisms originating in the People’s Republic of China.
(2) The request has been lodged on 28 February 2005 by Ring Alliance Ringbuchtechnik GmbH on behalf of producers representing more than 70 % of the Community production of certain ring binder mechanisms.
(3) The product concerned by the possible circumvention is certain ring binder mechanisms normally declared under CN code ex83051000 originating in the People’s Republic of China (PRC). This CN code is given only for information.
(4) The product under investigation is certain ring binder mechanisms consigned from Lao People’s Democratic Republic (product under investigation) normally declared under the same codes as the product concerned originating in the People’s Republic of China.
(5) The measures currently in force and possibly being circumvented are anti-dumping measures imposed by Council Regulation (EC) No 2074/2004 [2] as extended to imports of the same product consigned from Vietnam [3].
(6) The request contains sufficient prima facie evidence, that the anti-dumping measures on imports of the product concerned originating in the People’s Republic of China are being circumvented by means of transhipment via Lao People’s Democratic Republic and/or by assembly in Lao People’s Democratic Republic of the product under investigation. The evidence submitted is as follows:
- The request shows a significant change in the pattern of trade, as imports of the product under investigation have increased substantially, whereas imports of the product concerned originating in the People’s Republic of China have decreased following the imposition of measures, and that there is insufficient due cause or justification other than the imposition of the duty for such a change.
- This change in the pattern of trade appears to stem from a transhipment of certain ring binder mechanisms originating in the People's Republic of China via Lao People’s Democratic Republic and/or the assembly of certain ring binder mechanisms in Lao People’s Democratic Republic.
- Furthermore, the request contains sufficient prima facie evidence that the remedial effects of the existing anti-dumping measures on imports of the product concerned originating in the People’s Republic of China are being undermined in terms of quantity and prices. Significant volumes of imports of certain ring binder mechanisms from Lao People’s Democratic Republic appear to have replaced imports of the product concerned originating in the People’s Republic of China.
- Finally, the request contains sufficient prima facie evidence that the prices of the product under investigation are dumped in relation to the normal value previously established for certain ring binder mechanisms originating in the People’s Republic of China.
- Should circumvention practices via Lao People’s Democratic Republic covered by Article 13 of the basic Regulation, other than transhipment and assembly, be identified in the course of the investigation, the investigation may cover these practices also.
(7) In light of the above, the Commission has concluded that sufficient evidence exists to justify the initiation of an investigation pursuant to Article 13 of the basic Regulation and to make imports of certain ring binder mechanisms consigned from Lao People’s Democratic Republic, whether declared as originating in Lao People’s Democratic Republic or not, subject to registration, in accordance with Article 14(5) of the Basic Regulation.
(8) In order to obtain the information it deems necessary for its investigation, the Commission will send questionnaires to the exporters/producers and to the associations of exporters/producers in Lao People’s Democratic Republic, to the exporters/producers and to the associations of exporters/producers in the People’s Republic of China, to the importers and to the associations of importers in the Community which cooperated in the investigation that lead to the existing measures or which are listed in the request and to the authorities of the People’s Republic of China and Lao People’s Democratic Republic. Information, as appropriate, may also be sought from the Community industry.
(9) In any event all interested parties should contact the Commission forthwith, but not later than the time limit set in Article 3 in order to find out whether they are listed in the request and, if necessary, request a questionnaire within the time limit set in Article 3(1) of this Regulation, given that the time limit set in Article 3(2) of this Regulation applies to all interested parties.
(10) The authorities of the People’s Republic of China and Lao People’s Democratic Republic will be notified of the initiation of the investigation and provided with a copy of the request.
(11) All interested parties are hereby invited to make their views known in writing and to provide supporting evidence. Furthermore, the Commission may hear interested parties, provided that they make a request in writing and show that there are particular reasons why they should be heard.
(c) Exemption of registration of imports or measures
(12) Since the possible circumvention takes place outside the Community, exemptions may be granted, in accordance with Article 13(4) of the basic Regulation, to producers of the product concerned that can show that they are not related to any producer subject to the measures and that are found not to be engaged in circumvention practices as defined in Articles 13(1) and 13(2) of the basic Regulation. Producers wishing to obtain an exemption should submit a request duly supported by evidence within the time limit indicated in Article 3(3) of this Regulation.
(13) Pursuant to Article 14(5) of the basic Regulation, imports of the product under investigation should be made subject to registration in order to ensure that, should the investigation result in findings of circumvention, anti-dumping duties of an appropriate amount can be levied retroactively from the date of registration of such imports consigned from Lao People’s Democratic Republic.
(14) In the interest of sound administration, time limits should be stated within which:
- interested parties may make themselves known to the Commission, present their views in writing and submit questionnaire replies or any other information to be taken into account during the investigation,
- producers in Lao People’s Democratic Republic may request exemption from registration of imports or measures,
- interested parties may make a written request to be heard by the Commission.
(15) Attention is drawn to the fact that the exercise of most procedural rights set out in the basic Regulation depends on the party’s making itself known within the time limits mentioned in Article 3 of this Regulation.
(16) In cases in which any interested party refuses access to or otherwise does not provide necessary information within the time limits, or significantly impedes the investigation, provisional or final findings, affirmative or negative, may be made in accordance with Article 18 of the basic Regulation, on the basis of the facts available.
(17) Where it is found that any interested party has supplied false or misleading information, the information shall be disregarded and use may be made, in accordance with Article 18 of the basic Regulation, of facts available. If any interested party does not cooperate or cooperates only partially, and findings are therefore based on facts available in accordance with Article 18 of the basic Regulation, the result may be less favourable to the party than if it had cooperated,
An investigation is hereby initiated pursuant to Article 13(3) of Regulation (EC) No 384/96, in order to determine if imports into the Community of certain ring binder mechanisms, falling within CN code ex83051000 (TARIC code 8305100013 and 8305100023), consigned from Lao People’s Democratic Republic, whether declared as originating in Lao People’s Democratic Republic or not, are circumventing the measures imposed by Regulation (EC) No 2074/2004.
For the purpose of this Regulation, ring binder mechanisms shall consist of two rectangular steel sheets or wires with at least four half rings made of steel wire fixed on it and which are kept together by a steel cover. They can be opened either by pulling the half rings or with a small steel-made trigger mechanism fixed to the ring binder mechanism.
The Customs authorities are hereby directed, pursuant to Articles 13(3) and 14(5) of Regulation (EC) No 384/96, to take the appropriate steps to register the imports into the Community identified in Article 1 of this Regulation.
Registration shall expire nine months following the date of entry into force of this Regulation.
The Commission, by regulation, may direct Customs authorities to cease registration in respect of imports into the Community of products manufactured by producers having applied for an exemption of registration and having been found not to be circumventing the anti-dumping duties.
1. Questionnaires should be requested from the Commission within 15 days from publication of this Regulation in the Official Journal of the European Union.
2. If their representations are to be taken into account during the investigation, interested parties must make themselves known by contacting the Commission, present their views in writing and submit questionnaire replies or any other information within 40 days from the date of the publication of this Regulation in the Official Journal of the European Union, unless otherwise specified.
3. Producers in Lao People’s Democratic Republic requesting exemption from registration of imports or measures should submit a request duly supported by evidence within the same 40-day time limit.
4. Interested parties may also apply to be heard by the Commission within the same 40-day time limit.
5. Any information relating to the matter, any request for a hearing or for a questionnaire as well as any request for exemption must be made in writing (not in electronic format, unless otherwise specified), must indicate the name, address, e-mail address, telephone, fax and/or telex numbers of the interested party. All written submission, including the information requested in this Regulation, questionnaire replies and correspondence provided by interested parties on a confidential basis shall be labelled as "Limited" [4] and, in accordance with Article 19(2) of the basic Regulation, shall be accompanied by a non-confidential version, which will be labelled "For inspection by interested parties" and should be sent to the following address:
Fax (32-2) 295 65 05.
This Regulation shall enter into force on the day following that of its publication in the Official Journal of the European Union.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Council Regulation (EC) No 560/2005
imposing certain specific restrictive measures directed against certain persons and entities in view of the situation in Côte d'Ivoire
THE COUNCIL OF THE EUROPEAN UNION,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community, and in particular Articles 60, 301 and 308 thereof,
Having regard to Council Common Position 2004/852/CFSP of 13 December 2004 concerning restrictive measures against Côte d'Ivoire [1],
Having regard to the proposal from the Commission,
Having regard to the opinion of the European Parliament [2],
(1) In Resolution 1572 (2004) of 15 November 2004, the UN Security Council, acting under Chapter VII of the Charter of the United Nations and deploring the resumption of hostilities in Côte d'Ivoire and the repeated violations of the ceasefire agreement of 3 May 2003, decided to impose certain restrictive measures against Côte d'Ivoire.
(2) Common Position 2004/852/CFSP provides for implementation of the measures set out in UN Security Council Resolution 1572 (2004), including the freezing of funds and economic resources of persons, designated by the competent United Nations Sanctions Committee, who constitute a threat to the peace and national reconciliation process in Côte d'Ivoire, in particular those who block implementation of the Linas-Marcoussis and Accra III Agreements, any other person determined as responsible for serious violations of human rights and international humanitarian law in Côte d'Ivoire on the basis of relevant information, any other person who incites publicly hatred and violence, and any other person determined by the Committee to be in violation of the arms embargo also imposed by Resolution 1572 (2004).
(3) These measures fall within the scope of the Treaty and, therefore, in order to avoid any distortion of competition, Community legislation is necessary to implement them as far as the Community is concerned. For the purpose of this Regulation, the territory of the Community is deemed to encompass the territories of the Member States to which the Treaty is applicable, under the conditions laid down in the Treaty.
(4) In order to ensure that the measures provided for in this Regulation are effective, this Regulation should enter into force on the day of its publication,
For the purposes of this Regulation, the following definitions shall apply:
1. "Sanctions Committee" means the Committee of the Security Council of the United Nations which was established pursuant to paragraph 14 of UN Security Council Resolution 1572 (2004);
2. "funds" means financial assets and benefits of every kind, including but not limited to:
(a) cash, cheques, claims on money, drafts, money orders and other payment instruments;
(b) deposits with financial institutions or other entities, balances on accounts, debts and debt obligations;
(c) publicly and privately traded securities and debt instruments, including stocks and shares, certificates representing securities, bonds, notes, warrants, debentures and derivatives contracts;
(d) interest, dividends or other income on or value accruing from or generated by assets;
(e) credit, right of set-off, guarantees, performance bonds or other financial commitments;
(f) letters of credit, bills of lading, bills of sale;
(g) documents evidencing an interest in funds or financial resources;
(h) any other instrument of export-financing.
3. "freezing of funds" means preventing any move, transfer, alteration, use of, access to, or dealing with funds in any way that would result in any change in their volume, amount, location, ownership, possession, character, destination or other change that would enable the funds to be used, including portfolio management;
4. "economic resources" means assets of every kind, whether tangible or intangible, movable or immovable, which are not funds but can be used to obtain funds, goods or services;
5. "freezing of economic resources" means preventing the use of economic resources to obtain funds, goods or services in any way, including, but not limited to, by selling, hiring or mortgaging them.
1. All funds and economic resources owned, or controlled, directly or indirectly, by the natural or legal persons or entities listed in Annex I shall be frozen.
2. No funds or economic resources shall be made available, directly or indirectly, to or for the benefit of the natural or legal persons or entities listed in Annex I.
3. The participation, knowingly and intentionally, in activities the object or effect of which is, directly or indirectly, to circumvent the measures referred to in paragraphs 1 and 2 shall be prohibited.
1. By way of derogation from Article 2, provided that the competent authorities of the Member States, as listed in Annex II, have notified the Sanctions Committee of their intention to authorise access to such funds and economic resources and have not received a negative decision by the Sanctions Committee within two working days of such notification, they may authorise the release of certain frozen funds or economic resources or the making available of certain frozen funds or economic resources, under such conditions as they deem appropriate, after having determined that the funds or economic resources concerned are:
(a) necessary for basic expenses, including payments for foodstuffs, rent or mortgage, medicines and medical treatment, taxes, insurance premiums, and public utility charges;
(b) intended exclusively for payment of reasonable professional fees and reimbursement of incurred expenses associated with the provision of legal services;
(c) intended exclusively for payment of fees or service charges for routine holding or maintenance of frozen funds or economic resources.
2. By way of derogation from Article 2, the competent authorities of the Member States as listed in Annex II may authorise the release of certain frozen funds or economic resources or the making available of certain frozen funds or economic resources, after having determined that the funds or economic resources are necessary for extraordinary expenses, provided that they have notified that determination to the Sanctions Committee and that the determination has been approved by that Committee, under the conditions envisaged by paragraph 14(e) of UN Security Council Resolution 1572 (2004).
By way of derogation from Article 2, the competent authorities of the Member States as listed in Annex II may authorise the release of certain frozen funds or economic resources if the following conditions are met:
(a) the funds or economic resources are subject of a judicial, administrative or arbitral lien established prior to 15 November 2004 or of a judicial, administrative or arbitral judgment rendered prior to that date;
(b) the funds or economic resources will be used exclusively to satisfy claims secured by such a lien or recognised as valid in such a judgment, within the limits set by applicable laws and regulations governing the rights of persons having such claims;
(c) the lien or judgment is not for the benefit of a person or entity listed in Annex I;
(d) recognising the lien or judgment is not contrary to public policy in the Member State concerned;
(e) the competent authorities have notified the lien or judgment to the Sanctions Committee.
The relevant competent authority shall inform the competent authorities of the other Member States and the Commission of any authorisation granted under Articles 3 or 4.
Article 2(2) shall not apply to the addition to frozen accounts of:
(a) interest or other earnings on those accounts; or
(b) payments due under contracts, agreements or obligations that were concluded or arose prior to the date on which those accounts became subject to this Regulation,
provided that any such interest, other earnings and payments are frozen in accordance with Article 2(1).
Article 2(2) shall not prevent the crediting of frozen accounts by financial institutions that receive funds transferred by third parties to the accounts of the persons or entities listed in Annex I provided that any such additions to such accounts are also frozen. The financial institution shall inform the competent authorities about such transactions without delay.
1. Without prejudice to the applicable rules concerning reporting, confidentiality and professional secrecy and to the provisions of Article 284 of the Treaty, natural and legal persons, entities and bodies shall:
(a) supply immediately any information which would facilitate compliance with this Regulation, such as accounts and amounts frozen in accordance with Article 2, to the competent authorities of the Member States listed in Annex II where they are resident or located, and shall transmit such information, directly or through these competent authorities, to the Commission;
(b) cooperate with the competent authorities listed in Annex II in any verification of this information.
2. Any additional information directly received by the Commission shall be made available to the competent authorities of the Member State concerned.
3. Any information provided or received in accordance with this Article shall be used only for the purposes for which it was provided or received.
The freezing of funds and economic resources or the refusal to make funds or economic resources available, carried out in good faith on the basis that such action is in accordance with this Regulation, shall not give rise to liability of any kind on the part of the natural or legal person or entity implementing it, or its directors or employees, unless it is proved that the funds and economic resources were frozen as result of negligence.
The Commission and Member States shall immediately inform each other of the measures taken under this Regulation and shall supply each other with any other relevant information at their disposal in connection with this Regulation, in particular information in respect of violation and enforcement problems and judgments handed down by national courts.
The Commission shall be empowered to:
(a) amend Annex I on the basis of determinations made by the Sanctions Committee; and
(b) amend Annex II on the basis of information supplied by Member States.
The Member States shall lay down the rules on penalties applicable to infringements of the provisions of this Regulation and shall take all measures necessary to ensure that they are implemented. The penalties provided for must be effective, proportionate and dissuasive. The Member States shall notify those rules to the Commission without delay after the entry into force of this Regulation and shall notify it of any subsequent amendment.
(a) within the territory of the Community, including its airspace;
(b) on board any aircraft or any vessel under the jurisdiction of a Member State;
(c) to any person inside or outside the territory of the Community who is a national of a Member State;
(d) to any legal person, group or entity which is incorporated or constituted under the law of a Member State;
(e) to any legal person, group or entity doing business within the Community.
This Regulation shall enter into force on the day of its publication in the Official Journal of the European Union.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 561/2005
establishing the standard import values for determining the entry price of certain fruit and vegetables
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Commission Regulation (EC) No 3223/94 of 21 December 1994 on detailed rules for the application of the import arrangements for fruit and vegetables [1], and in particular Article 4(1) thereof,
(1) Regulation (EC) No 3223/94 lays down, pursuant to the outcome of the Uruguay Round multilateral trade negotiations, the criteria whereby the Commission fixes the standard values for imports from third countries, in respect of the products and periods stipulated in the Annex thereto.
(2) In compliance with the above criteria, the standard import values must be fixed at the levels set out in the Annex to this Regulation,
The standard import values referred to in Article 4 of Regulation (EC) No 3223/94 shall be fixed as indicated in the Annex hereto.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 14 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 562/2005
laying down rules for the implementation of Council Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 as regards communications between the Member States and the Commission in the milk and milk products sector
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 of 17 May 1999 on the common organisation of the market in milk and milk products [1], and in particular Article 40 thereof,
(1) Commission Regulation (EC) No 1498/1999 of 8 July 1999 laying down rules for the implementation of Council Regulation (EEC) No 804/68 as regards communications between the Member States and the Commission in the milk and milk products sector [2], has been substantially amended several times. Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 and all the regulations laying down rules for the implementation thereof have introduced a number of amendments. For the sake of clarity, Regulation (EC) No 1498/1999 should therefore be repealed and replaced by a new Regulation.
(2) Appraisal of the production and market situation in the milk and milk products sector necessitates a regular exchange of information on the operation of the intervention measures provided for in Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999, particularly with regard to changes in stocks of the products concerned, held by intervention agencies and in private storage.
(3) Aid for skimmed milk processed into casein and refunds can be fixed only on the basis of information on changes in prices both on the internal market and in international trade.
(4) The accurate and regular monitoring of trade flows to assess the effect of refunds requires information on exports of products for which refunds are fixed, particularly the quantities awarded under tendering procedures.
(5) The implementation of the Agreement on Agriculture concluded under the Uruguay Round of multilateral trade negotiations (hereinafter referred to as "the Agreement on Agriculture"), approved by Council Decision 94/800/EC [3] requires a wide range of detailed information to be provided on imports and exports, in particular with regard to licence applications and the way licences are used, in order to ensure compliance with undertakings under the Agreement on Agriculture. Rapid information on export trends is needed in order to make maximum use of those undertakings. Under that Agreement, food aid exports are not subject to the constraints applying to subsidised exports. It should be provided that communications relating to export licence applications must accordingly specify which licence applications cover food aid supplies.
(6) Commission Regulation (EC) No 174/1999 of 26 January 1999 laying down special detailed rules for the application of Council Regulation (EEC) No 804/68 as regards export licences and export refunds in the case of milk and milk products [4] lays down special rules for the export of certain milk products to Canada, the United States and the Dominican Republic. Provision should be made for the relevant information to be communicated.
(7) Regulation (EC) No 174/1999 introduces specific arrangements for the grant of refunds on ingredients of Community origin in processed cheese manufactured under the inward processing arrangements. Provision should be made for the relevant information to be communicated.
(8) Under Article 5 of Regulation (EC) No 174/1999, in certain cases, export licences can be valid for exportation of a product with a code other than that entered in box 16 of the licence. Provision should be made for the relevant information to be communicated.
(9) Commission Regulation (EC) No 2535/2001 of 14 December 2001 laying down detailed rules for applying Council Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 as regards the import arrangements for milk and milk products and opening tariff quotas [5], provides for certain import quotas to be administered by means of IMA 1 certificates issued by the authorities of third countries. The Member States inform the Commission of the quantity of products for which import licences are issued on the basis of IMA 1 certificates. Experience has shown that such notification is not always sufficient to allow such imports to be monitored closely at each stage. Provision should be made for additional information to be communicated.
(10) Experience gained over the years in processing the information received by the Commission has shown that it is sometimes communicated on an excessively frequent basis. Therefore, the frequency of some communications has been reduced.
(11) It is essential to be able to compare price quotations for products, particularly for the purposes of calculating refunds and aid amounts. It is also necessary to know how plausible these price quotations are, by weighting the data.
(12) Means of communication have evolved considerably in recent years. Account should be taken of that evolution to make communications more rapid, more efficient and more secure.
(13) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the Management Committee for Milk and Milk Products,
1. In the case of intervention measures taken under Article 6(1) of Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999, Member States shall communicate the following information to the Commission not later than the 10th of each month for the previous month:
(a) the quantities of butter in storage at the end of the month concerned and the quantities entering and leaving storage during that month, using the model in Annex I, Part A, to this Regulation;
(b) a breakdown of the quantities of butter leaving storage during the month concerned, according to the regulations by which they are covered, using the model in Annex I, Part B, to this Regulation;
(c) a breakdown by age of the quantities of butter in storage at the end of the month concerned, using the model in Annex I, Part C, to this Regulation.
2. In the case of intervention measures taken under Article 6(3) of Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999, Member States shall communicate the following information to the Commission not later than the 10th of each month for the previous month, using the model in Annex II to this Regulation:
(a) the quantities of butter and cream converted into butter equivalent entering and leaving storage during the month concerned.
(b) the total quantity of butter and cream converted into butter equivalent in storage at the end of the month concerned.
In the case of intervention measures taken under Article 7(1) of Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999, Member States shall communicate, not later than the 10th of each month for the previous month:
(a) the quantities of skimmed-milk powder in storage at the end of the month concerned and the quantities entering and leaving storage during that month, using the model in Annex III, Part A, to this Regulation;
(b) a breakdown of the quantities of skimmed-milk powder leaving storage during the month concerned, using the model in Annex III, Part B, to this Regulation;
(c) a breakdown by age of the quantities of skimmed-milk powder in storage at the end of the month concerned, using the model in Annex III, Part C, to this Regulation.
In the case of intervention measures taken under Articles 8 and 9 of Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999, Member States shall communicate, not later than the 10th of each month for the previous month, using the model in Annex IV to this Regulation:
(a) the quantities of cheese entering and leaving storage during the month concerned, broken down by categories of cheese;
(b) the quantities of cheese in storage at the end of the month concerned, broken down by categories of cheese.
For the purposes of this Chapter, the following definitions shall apply:
(a) "quantities entering" means quantities physically placed in storage, whether or not taken over by the intervention agency;
(b) "quantities leaving" means quantities which have been removed or, if taken over by the purchaser before removal, quantities taken over.
MEASURES RELATING TO AID FOR SKIMMED MILK AND SKIMMED-MILK POWDER
1. In the case of aid granted under Article 11(1) of Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 for skimmed milk and skimmed-milk powder used in feeding stuffs, Member States shall communicate the following information to the Commission, not later than the 20th of each month for the previous month, using the model in Annex V to this Regulation:
(a) the quantities of skimmed milk used in the manufacture of compound feeding stuffs covered by aid applications submitted during the month concerned;
(b) the quantities of denatured skimmed-milk powder covered by aid applications submitted during the month concerned;
(c) the quantities of skimmed-milk powder used in the manufacture of compound feeding stuffs covered by aid applications submitted during the month concerned.
2. In the case of aid granted under Article 12 of Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 for skimmed milk processed into casein, Member States shall communicate to the Commission, not later than the 20th of each month, using the model in Annex V to this Regulation, the quantities of skimmed milk covered by aid applications submitted during the previous month. Such quantities shall be broken down according to the quality of the casein or caseinates produced.
1. Member States shall communicate to the Commission not later than each Wednesday 11 a.m. (Brussels time) the ex-factory prices applied in their territory in the previous week for products listed in Annex VI. Member States shall communicate prices reported by operators for dairy products, except for cheeses, where national production represents 2 % or more of the Community production, or where its production is considered as representative at national level by the competent national authority. For cheeses, Member States shall communicate prices by type of cheese, representing 8 % or more of the total national cheese production.
2. Member States shall communicate to the Commission no later than one month after the end of the previous month the prices of raw milk paid to milk producers in their territory.
The prices shall be expressed as weighted averages established in the form of sample surveys by the Member State authority.
3. Member States shall take the necessary steps to ensure that their communications on the prices applied in the Community are representative, accurate and complete. To this end, the Member States shall notify the Commission annually by 31 May at the latest a report following the standard questionnaire in Annex XII.
4. The Member States shall take the measures necessary to ensure that the economic operators concerned provide them with the information required within the relevant time limits.
5. For the purpose of this Article "ex-factory price" means the price at which the product is purchased from the enterprise, excluding taxes (VAT) and any other cost (transport, loading, handling, storage, pallets, insurance, etc.). The price is expressed as weighted average established in the form of sample surveys by the Member State authority.
Member States shall communicate the following information to the Commission:
1. not later than one month following the end of the quota year for the previous quota year, the quantities of products covered by import licences issued under the quotas referred to in Article 5 of Regulation (EC) No 2535/2001, broken down by CN code and by country of origin code;
2. not later than 10 January and 10 July for the six previous months, the quantities of products covered by import licences issued under the quotas referred to in Article 24 of Regulation (EC) No 2535/2001, broken down by CN code and by country of origin code;
3. not later than the 10th of each month for the previous month, the quantities of products covered by import licences subject to the application of non-preferential duties as referred to in the Common Customs Tariff, broken down by CN code and by country of origin code;
4. not later than the 10th of each month for the previous month, the quantities of products, covered by import licences issued for imports under Article 1 of Council Regulation (EC) No 2007/2000 [6] and under Article 10 of the Interim Agreement between the Community and Lebanon approved by Council Decision 2002/761/EC [7] broken down by CN code and by country of origin code;
5. not later than the 10th of each month for the previous month, the quantities of products, covered by import licences issued under the quotas referred to in Article 20 of Regulation (EC) No 2535/2001, broken down by CN code and by country of origin code;
6. once a year, not later than three months after the end of each quota period, the unused quantities of licences issued within the framework of import quotas referred to in Regulation (EC) No 2535/2001, broken down by quota number, CN code and country of origin code.
Where applicable, Member States shall inform the Commission that no licences have been issued for the relevant reference periods.
By 31 March at the latest in respect of the previous year, using the model in Annex VII, Member States shall communicate the following data to the Commission, broken down by CN code, concerning the import licences issued on presentation of an IMA 1 certificate, in accordance with Chapter III of Title 2 of Regulation (EC) No 2535/2001, specifying the IMA 1 certificate numbers:
(a) the quantity of products covered by the certificate and the date of issue of the import licences;
b) the quantity of products in respect of which the security has been released.
1. Member States shall communicate the following information to the Commission by 6 p.m. on each working day:
(a) the quantities, broken down by code of the export refund nomenclature for milk products and by destination code, covered by applications submitted that day for licences:
(i) as referred to in Article 1 of Regulation (EC) No 174/1999, with the exception of those referred to in Article 17 of that Regulation,
(ii) as referred to in Article 17 of Regulation (EC) No 174/1999;
(b) where appropriate, that no applications referred to in point (a) have been submitted on that day;
(c) the quantities, broken down by application and by code of the export refund nomenclature for milk products and by destination code, covered by applications submitted on that day for provisional licences referred to in Article 8 of Regulation (EC) No 174/1999, indicating:
(i) the closing date for submitting tenders, accompanied by a copy of the document confirming the invitation to tender for the quantities applied for,
(ii) the quantity of products covered by the invitation to tender or, in the case of an invitation to tender opened by the armed forces in accordance with Article 36(1)(c) of Commission Regulation (EC) No 800/1999 [8] not specifying the quantity, the approximate quantity broken down as specified;
(d) the quantities, broken down by code of the export refund nomenclature for milk products and by destination code, for which the provisional licences referred to in Article 8 of Regulation (EC) No 174/1999 were definitively issued or cancelled that day, indicating the body issuing the invitation to tender, the date of the provisional licence and the quantity it covers, using the model in Annex VIII Part A, to this Regulation;
(e) where appropriate, the revised quantity of products covered by the invitation to tender referred to in point (c), using the model in Annex VIII Part A, to this Regulation;
(f) the quantities, broken down by country and by code of the export refund nomenclature for milk products, covered by definitive licences with a refund issued under Articles 20 and 20a of Regulation (EC) No 174/1999, using the model in Annex VIII, Part B, to this Regulation.
2. As regards the communication referred to in paragraph 1 (c)(i), where more applications have been submitted for the same invitation to tender, one communication per Member State will suffice.
3. Member States shall not communicate on a daily basis the quantities for which export licence applications have been submitted under the second subparagraph of Article 1(1) and Articles 18, 20 and 20a of Regulation (EC) No 174/1999 where no refund has been applied for, or where they are for supplies of food aid within the meaning of Article 10(4) of the Agreement on Agriculture concluded under the Uruguay Round.
Member States shall communicate to the Commission on Monday each week for the previous week the quantities, broken down by code of the export refund nomenclature for milk products, covered by applications for the licences referred to in the second subparagraph of Article 1(1) of Regulation (EC) No 174/1999, without a refund, using the model in Annex VIII, Part C, to this Regulation.
Member States shall communicate the following information to the Commission before the 16th of each month for the previous month:
(a) the quantities, broken down by code of the export refund nomenclature for milk products, covered by licence applications cancelled under point (b) of the first subparagraph of Article 10(3) of Regulation (EC) No 174/1999, indicating the refund rate, using the model in Annex IX, Part A, to this Regulation;
(b) the quantities, broken down by code of the export refund nomenclature for milk products, not exported after expiry of the period of validity of the relevant licences, and the relevant refund rate, using the model in Annex IX, Part B, to this Regulation;
(c) the quantities, broken down by code of the export refund nomenclature for milk products and by destination code, covered by export licence applications for supplies of food aid in accordance with Article 10(4) of the Agreement on Agriculture concluded under the Uruguay Round, using the model in Annex IX, Part C, to this Regulation;
(d) the quantities of milk products, broken down by CN code and by country of origin code, which are not in one of the situations referred to in Article 23(2) of the Treaty and are imported for use in the manufacture of products falling within CN code 040630, in accordance with the third indent of Article 11(6) of Regulation (EC) No 800/1999 and for which the authorisation referred to in Article 17(1) of Regulation (EC) No 174/1999 has been granted, using the model in Annex IX, Part D, to this Regulation;
(e) the quantities broken down by CN code or, where appropriate, by code of the export refund nomenclature for milk products, for which definitive licences have been issued and where no refund is applied for, as referred to in Articles 18 and 20 of Regulation (EC) No 174/1999, using the model in Annex IX, Part E, to this Regulation.
Member States shall communicate to the Commission before the 16th of each month (n) for month n-4, using the model in Annex X, Part A, the quantities, broken down by CN code and destination code, for which the formalities for export without a refund have been completed.
Member States shall communicate the following information to the Commission before 16 July for the previous GATT year:
(a) the quantities for which application of Article 5(3) of Regulation (EC) No 174/1999 has been accepted and in so far as it results in a difference in the export refund granted, indicating the refund rate and the code of the export refund nomenclature for milk products entered in box 16 of the export licence issued and the code of the export refund nomenclature for the product actually exported, using the model in Annex X, Part B, to this Regulation.
(b) the quantities, broken down by code of the export refund nomenclature for milk products, to which Article 18(3) of Regulation (EC) No 800/1999 has been applied, in so far as the refund rate actually applied is different from that indicated on the licence, and the refund for the destination indicated on the licence and that actually applied, using the model in Annex X, Part C, to this Regulation.
Member States shall communicate to the Commission the information required under this Regulation using the means of communication provided for in Annex XI.
The Commission shall keep available for the Member States the data transmitted by them.
Regulation (EC) No 1498/1999 is repealed.
Regulation (EC) No 1498/1999 shall continue to apply to transmission of data relating to the period before the application of this Regulation.
References made to the repealed Regulation shall be construed as references to this Regulation and shall be read in accordance with the correlation table in Annex XIII.
This Regulation shall enter into force on the seventh day following its publication in the Official Journal of the European Union.
It shall apply from 1 July 2005. However, Article 6(3) shall apply from 31 May 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 563/2005
fixing representative prices in the poultrymeat and egg sectors and for egg albumin, and amending Regulation (EC) No 1484/95
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EEC) No 2771/75 of 29 October 1975 on the common organisation of the market in eggs [1], and in particular Article 5(4) thereof,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EEC) No 2777/75 of 29 October 1975 on the common organisation of the market in poultrymeat [2], and in particular Article 5(4) thereof,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EEC) No 2783/75 of 29 October 1975 on the common system of trade for ovalbumin and lactalbumin [3], and in particular Article 3(4) thereof,
(1) Commission Regulation (EC) No 1484/95 [4], fixes detailed rules for implementing the system of additional import duties and fixes representative prices in the poultrymeat and egg sectors and for egg albumin.
(2) It results from regular monitoring of the information providing the basis for the verification of the import prices in the poultrymeat and egg sectors and for egg albumin that the representative prices for imports of certain products should be amended taking into account variations of prices according to origin. Therefore, representative prices should be published.
(3) It is necessary to apply this amendment as soon as possible, given the situation on the market.
(4) HAS ADOPTED THIS REGULATION:
Annex I to Regulation (EC) No 1484/95 is hereby replaced by the Annex hereto.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 14 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Council Regulation (EC) No 564/2005
amending Regulation (EC) No 1601/2001 imposing a definitive anti-dumping duty and definitively collecting the provisional anti-dumping duty imposed on imports of certain iron or steel ropes and cables originating in the Czech Republic, Russia, Thailand and Turkey
THE COUNCIL OF THE EUROPEAN UNION,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 384/96 of 22 December 1995 on protection against dumped imports from countries not members of the European Community [1] ("the basic Regulation"), and in particular Article 11(3) thereof,
Having regard to the proposal submitted by the Commission after consulting the Advisory Committee,
(1) On 5 May 2000, the Commission initiated an anti-dumping proceeding [2] on imports of certain iron or steel ropes and cables originating, inter alia, in Turkey.
(2) This proceeding ultimately resulted in a definitive anti-dumping duty being imposed by Council Regulation (EC) No 1601/2001 [3] in order to eliminate the injurious effects of dumping.
B. REQUEST FOR AN INTERIM REVIEW
(3) A request for a partial interim review of Regulation (EC) No 1601/2001 was received from Has Çelik ve Halat Sanayi Ticaret A.S. ("Has Çelik", or "the applicant"), a Turkish exporting producer of certain iron or steel ropes and cables subject to the anti-dumping measures in force.
(4) In this request pursuant to Article 11(3) of the basic Regulation it was claimed that the circumstances with regard to dumping on the basis of which the measures in force were established have changed and that these changes are of a lasting nature.
(5) According to the request, the applicant has undergone structural changes which have had a significant impact on the normal value. Furthermore, it was claimed that a comparison of normal value based on its costs or domestic prices and export prices to the Community would lead to a reduction of dumping significantly below the level of the current measures applying to imports from the applicant, i.e. 17,8 %. Therefore, the continued imposition of measures at the existing levels, which were based on the level of dumping previously established, would no longer be necessary to offset dumping.
(6) Having determined, after consulting the Advisory Committee, that sufficient evidence existed for the initiation of a partial interim review, the Commission published a notice ("Notice of Initiation") [4] and commenced an investigation, limited in scope to the examination of dumping by the applicant.
(7) The Commission officially advised the representatives of the exporting country and the applicant of the initiation of the partial interim review and gave all the parties directly concerned the opportunity to make their views known in writing and to request a hearing. A submission was received from EWRIS, the Liaison Committee of E.U. Wire Rope Industries which was the complainant in the original case.
(8) The Commission also sent a questionnaire to the applicant, which replied within the time limits set in the Notice of Initiation.
(9) The Commission sought and verified all information it deemed necessary for the purpose of a determination of dumping and carried out a verification visit at the premises of the applicant.
(10) The investigation of dumping covered the period from 1 July 2003 to 29 February 2004 ("the investigation period").
(11) The product concerned is the same as in the investigation which lead to the imposition of the existing measures ("the previous investigation"), i.e. iron or steel ropes and cables, including locked coil ropes, excluding ropes and cables of stainless steel, with a maximum cross-sectional dimension exceeding 3 mm, with fittings attached or not ("steel wire ropes" or "SWR"), originating in Turkey, currently classifiable within CN codes 73121082, 73121084, 73121086, 73121088 and 73121099.
(12) As in the previous investigation, this investigation has shown that the SWR produced in Turkey by the applicant and sold on the Turkish market or exported to the Community have the same basic physical characteristics and the same uses, and therefore are to be considered a like product within the meaning of Article 1(4) of the basic Regulation.
(13) As far as the determination of normal value is concerned, it was first established whether the applicant's total domestic sales of the like product were representative in comparison with its total export sales to the Community. In accordance with Article 2(2) of the basic Regulation this was found to be the case since its domestic sales volume constituted at least 5 % of its total export sales volume to the Community.
(14) For each of the types sold by the applicant on its domestic market and found to be directly comparable to the types exported to the Community, it was examined whether domestic sales were sufficiently representative for the purposes of Article 2(2) of the basic Regulation. This was considered to be the case when, during the investigation period, the total domestic sales volume of a type represented 5 % or more of the total sales volume of the same type exported to the Community. For most of the types exported to the Community during the investigation period a comparable representative type sold on the domestic market was found.
(15) For the product types meeting the 5 % test, an examination was then made as to whether the domestic sales of each comparable type could be regarded as having been made in the ordinary course of trade, by establishing the proportion of sales to independent customers of the type in question not made at a loss. In all cases, sales of a type not made at a loss represented more than 80 % of the total domestic sales volume of that type and, therefore, normal value was based on a weighted average price of all domestic sales made during the investigation period.
(16) For the product types exported to the Community where no comparable types sold on the domestic market were found, normal value was constructed on the basis of the costs of manufacturing incurred by the applicant for the exported product types in question plus a reasonable amount for selling, general and administrative costs and profits in accordance with Article 2(3) and 2(6) of the basic Regulation. The general and administrative costs were based on the applicant's domestic sales of the like product. The profit margin was based on the applicant's domestic sales of the like product made in the ordinary course of trade.
(17) Since all export sales of the product concerned were made directly to independent customers in the Community, the export price was established on the basis of such prices paid or payable, in accordance with Article 2(8) of the basic Regulation.
(18) The comparison of normal value with export price was made on an ex-factory basis and at the same level of trade. For the purpose of ensuring a fair comparison, account was taken, in accordance with Article 2(10) of the basic Regulation, of differences in factors which were claimed and demonstrated to affect prices and price comparability, i.e. transport costs, insurance costs, handling, loading and ancillary costs, credit costs and commissions.
(19) The comparison was made between the weighted average adjusted normal value per product type and the weighted average net ex-works export price for the comparable product type, in accordance with Article 2(11) of the basic Regulation.
(20) The comparison as described above did not show the existence of any dumping.
F. LASTING NATURE OF CHANGED CIRCUMSTANCES
(21) In accordance with Article 11(3) of the basic Regulation, it was also examined whether the changed circumstances could reasonably be said to be of a lasting nature.
(22) In this respect, the investigation revealed that the applicant has undergone structural changes affecting considerably the production structure and organisation, resulting in a substantially higher production efficiency that led to a drop in production costs and thus reduced normal value as compared to the investigation period used in the previous investigation ( 1 April 1999 until 31 March 2000). During the same period, export prices have increased and no reason was found to indicate that this increase was temporary.
(23) It is consequently concluded that the changed circumstances, in particular the increase in export prices to the Community combined with a substantial decrease in production costs, are of a lasting nature.
(24) In the absence of dumping, it is therefore considered appropriate to repeal the measures insofar as they concern the applicant.
(25) The interested parties were informed of the facts and considerations on the basis of which it was intended to recommend an amendment of Regulation (EC) No 1601/2001 and were given an opportunity to comment.
(26) Subsequently, EWRIS submitted some general comments relating mainly to increasing prices of raw materials after the investigation period. EWRIS did not put in question the findings concerning dumping as outlined above, but nevertheless expressed concern about the possibility that the applicant may resume dumping in the future.
(27) Concerning the prices of raw materials, it is noted that the prices of raw materials may have increased after the investigation period, but this could not have been taken into account in the dumping calculation for the applicant. In this case, the main raw material is wire rod, a basic steel product, which is a commodity with prices normally fluctuating within short periods. Therefore, any price increase of such raw material cannot be considered to be of a lasting nature, which could put into question the above findings.
(28) Finally, it should be noted that, since the repeal of the measures concerns only the applicant, and not Turkey as a whole, the applicant remains subject to the proceeding and may be reinvestigated in any subsequent review carried out for Turkey pursuant to Article 11(6) of the basic Regulation,
Regulation (EC) No 1601/2001 is hereby amended as follows:
In the table of Article 1(3) the rate of duty (%) for the company Has Çelik ve Halat Sanayi Ticaret A.S. (TARIC additional code A220) shall be replaced by the following:
This Regulation shall enter into force on the day following that of its publication in the Official Journal of the European Union.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 565/2005
establishing the standard import values for determining the entry price of certain fruit and vegetables
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Commission Regulation (EC) No 3223/94 of 21 December 1994 on detailed rules for the application of the import arrangements for fruit and vegetables [1], and in particular Article 4(1) thereof,
(1) Regulation (EC) No 3223/94 lays down, pursuant to the outcome of the Uruguay Round multilateral trade negotiations, the criteria whereby the Commission fixes the standard values for imports from third countries, in respect of the products and periods stipulated in the Annex thereto.
(2) In compliance with the above criteria, the standard import values must be fixed at the levels set out in the Annex to this Regulation,
The standard import values referred to in Article 4 of Regulation (EC) No 3223/94 shall be fixed as indicated in the Annex hereto.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 15 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 566/2005
amending the rates of the refunds applicable to certain milk products exported in the form of goods not covered by Annex I to the Treaty
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 of 17 May 1999 on the common organisation of the markets in the milk and milk products sector [1], and in particular Article 31(3) thereof,
(1) The rates of the refunds applicable from 24 March 2005 to the products listed in the Annex, exported in the form of goods not covered by Annex I to the Treaty, were fixed by Commission Regulation (EC) No 468/2005 [2].
(2) It follows from applying the rules and criteria contained in Regulation (EC) No 468/2005 to the information at present available to the Commission that the export refunds at present applicable should be altered as shown in the Annex hereto,
The rates of refund fixed by Regulation (EC) No 468/2005 are hereby altered as shown in the Annex hereto.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 15 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 567/2005
setting, for the 2004/2005 marketing year, the amounts to be paid to olive oil producer organisations and associations thereof recognised under Council Regulation No 136/66/EEC
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation No 136/66/EEC of 22 September 1966 on the establishment of a common organisation of the market in oils and fats [1], and in particular Article 20d(4) thereof,
(1) Article 20d(1) of Regulation No 136/66/EEC provides for a percentage of production aid to be withheld to help finance the work of recognised producer organisations and associations thereof. For the 1998/1999, 1999/2000, 2000/2001, 2001/2002, 2002/2003, 2003/2004 and 2004/2005 marketing years that percentage is 0,8 %.
(2) Under Article 21(1) of Commission Regulation (EC) No 2366/98 of 30 October 1998 [2] laying down detailed rules for the application of the system of production aid for olive oil for the 1998/1999, 1999/2000, 2000/2001, 2001/2002, 2002/2003, 2003/2004 and 2004/2005 marketing years, the unit amounts to be paid to producer organisations and associations thereof are to be fixed on the basis of the forecasts of the overall sum to be distributed. The funds that will become available in each Member State as a result of the amount withheld as referred to above must be distributed in an appropriate way among those eligible.
(3) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the Management Committee for Oils and Fats,
For the 2004/2005 marketing year, the amounts provided for in Article 21(1)(a) and (b) of Regulation (EC) No 2366/98 shall be as follows:
- for Greece EUR 2,0 and EUR 2,0 respectively
- for Spain EUR 4,5 and EUR 2,2 respectively
- for France EUR 0,0 and EUR 0,0 respectively
- for Italy EUR 2,0 and EUR 2,2 respectively
- for Malta EUR 0,0 and EUR 0,0 respectively
- for Portugal EUR 0,0 and EUR 6,5 respectively
- for Slovenia EUR 0,0 and EUR 0,0 respectively
This Regulation shall enter into force on the third day following its publication in the Official Journal of the European Union.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 568/2005
amending Regulation (EC) No 1159/2003 laying down detailed rules of application for the 2003/04, 2004/05 and 2005/06 marketing years for the import of cane sugar under certain tariff quotas and preferential agreements and amending Regulations (EC) No 1464/95 and (EC) No 779/96
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1260/2001 of 19 June 2001 on the common organisation of the markets in the sugar sector [1], and in particular Articles 22(2) and 39(6) thereof,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1095/96 of 18 June 1996 on the implementation of the concessions set out in Schedule CXL drawn up in the wake of the conclusion of the GATT XXIV.6 negotiations [2], and in particular Article 1 thereof,
(1) Experience gained during the 2003/04 marketing year, which was the first period of application of Commission Regulation (EC) No 1159/2003 [3], has shown that the common detailed rules of application laid down by that Regulation need to be improved, in particular as regards the method of determining the quantities of the delivery obligations for ACP-India preferential sugar.
(2) To guarantee the predictability required for the smooth running of commercial transactions the Commission, before the start of the delivery period concerned, should provisionally determine the quantities of the delivery obligations in accordance with the procedure referred to in Article 42(2) of Regulation (EC) No 1260/2001.
(3) During the delivery period, once more details are known about the quantities actually delivered in the previous years, these quantities should be fixed subject to possible amendment when the exact figures are available. Without prejudice to investigations to be carried out, a method should also be adopted to process, when determining the quantities of the delivery obligations, the nominal quantities of import licences for which it has not been possible to establish the actual import into the Community.
(4) Regulation (EC) No 1159/2003 should therefore be amended accordingly.
(5) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the Management Committee for Sugar,
Article 9 of Regulation (EC) No 1159/2003 is hereby replaced by the following:
1. The Commission shall determine, in accordance with the procedure referred to in Article 42(2) of Regulation (EC) No 1260/2001, the quantities of the delivery obligations for each exporting country concerned, in accordance with Articles 3 and 7 of the ACP Protocol, Articles 3 and 7 of the Agreement with India, and Articles 11 and 12 of this Regulation.
2. The quantities of the delivery obligations for a delivery period:
(a) shall be determined provisionally before 1 May preceding the period in question;
(b) shall be adopted before 1 February of the period in question;
(c) shall occasionally be adjusted during the period in question if necessary as a result of new information, in particular to resolve duly justified specific cases.
The delivery obligations taken into account for the issue of licences as referred to in Article 4 shall be equal to the quantities determined under the first paragraph hereto, adjusted, if necessary, in line with the decisions taken under Articles 3 and 7 of the ACP Protocol and of the Agreement with India.
3. The quantities of delivery obligations shall be determined in accordance with Articles 3 and 7 of the ACP Protocol, Articles 3 and 7 of the Agreement with India, and Articles 11 and 12 of this Regulation, taking into account in particular:
(a) the deliveries actually recorded over the preceding delivery periods;
(b) the quantities declared as quantities which could not be delivered, in accordance with Article 7 of the ACP Protocol and of the Agreement with India.
Where the nominal quantities for which import licences have been issued exceed the quantities of deliveries actually recorded in the previous delivery periods, without prejudice to the results of the investigations to be carried out by the competent authorities, the nominal quantities of the licences for which it has not been possible to establish the actual import into the Community shall be added to the quantities referred to in point (a) of the first paragraph.
4. The adjustments referred to in paragraph 2(c) may comprise transfers of quantities between two consecutive delivery periods provided that this does not disrupt the supply arrangements referred to in Article 39 of Regulation (EC) No 1260/2001.
5. The total for each delivery period of the quantities of the delivery obligations for the different exporting countries concerned shall be imported as preferential ACP-India sugar under the delivery obligations at zero duty.
The delivery obligation for the 2003/04, 2004/05 and 2005/06 marketing years shall bear the following serial number: "ACP-India preferential sugar": No 09.4321."
This Regulation shall enter into force on the third day following its publication in the Official Journal of the European Union.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 569/2005
establishing a transitional measure for the 2004/2005 marketing year on funding the storage of cereals offered for intervention in the Czech Republic, Estonia, Cyprus, Latvia, Lithuania, Hungary, Malta, Poland, Slovenia and Slovakia
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to the Treaty of Accession of the Czech Republic, Estonia, Cyprus, Latvia, Lithuania, Hungary, Malta, Poland, Slovenia and Slovakia,
Having regard to the Act of Accession of the Czech Republic, Estonia, Cyprus, Latvia, Lithuania, Hungary, Malta, Poland, Slovenia and Slovakia, and in particular the first subparagraph of Article 41 thereof,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1784/2003 of 29 September 2003 on the common organisation of the market in cereals [1],
(1) At the request of certain Member States, Commission Regulation (EC) No 495/2005 [2] extends by three months, for the 2004/2005 marketing year, the deadline for delivering cereals offered for intervention in the Member States which joined the European Community on 1 May 2004, although it does not authorise delivery beyond 31 July 2005.
(2) This measure may give rise to additional storage costs for cereals delivered by this new deadline but after the time-limit initially laid down in the third subparagraph of Article 4(3) of Commission Regulation (EC) No 824/2000 of 19 April 2000 establishing procedures for the taking-over of cereals by intervention agencies and laying down methods of analysis for determining the quality of cereals [3].
(3) In accordance with Article 6 of Council Regulation (EEC) No 1883/78 of 2 August 1978 laying down general rules for the financing of interventions by the European Agricultural Guidance and Guarantee Fund, Guarantee Section [4], the EAGGF Guarantee Section covers expenditure on the physical operations involved in storage. Member State expenditure on the reimbursement of any additional storage costs, as referred to above, should be treated as expenditure arising from storage costs normally borne by the intervention agencies, and provision should be made for that expenditure to be funded by the EAGGF Guarantee Section on the basis of the same standard amount, account also being taken of the monthly increase added to the intervention price, as provided for in Article 4(3) of Regulation (EC) No 1784/2003.
(4) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the EAGGF Committee,
Where the cereals offered for intervention in the Czech Republic, Estonia, Cyprus, Latvia, Lithuania, Hungary, Malta, Poland, Slovenia and Slovakia have been effectively taken over by the intervention agency after the deadline laid down in the third subparagraph of Article 4(3) of Commission Regulation (EC) No 824/2000, Member State expenditure in respect of storage costs incurred between that deadline and the date of actual delivery to the warehouse designated in the delivery schedule, which must be before the deadline laid down in Regulation (EC) No 495/2005, shall be treated as expenditure of the type referred to in Article 6 of Regulation (EEC) No 1883/78.
The standard amount referred to in the first paragraph of Article 6 of Regulation (EEC) No 1883/78 shall be calculated on the basis of the standard amount reimbursed by the Community to the Member States for the storage of cereals purchased for intervention during the 2004/05 marketing year, as laid down in the Commission Decision of 8 October 2004 [5], i.e. EUR 1,26 per tonne per month, from which shall be deducted the monthly increase provided for in Article 4(3) of Regulation (EC) No 1784/2003, i.e. EUR 0,46 per tonne per month, which has been added to the intervention price for each month after the deadline laid down in the third subparagraph of Article 4(3) of Regulation (EC) No 824/2000.
Such expenditure shall be taken into account in the context of the annual expenditure referred to in Article 1 of Council Regulation (EEC) No 3492/90 [6] as expenditure on the physical operations involved in the buying-in of products by intervention agencies.
This Regulation shall enter into force on the third day following its publication in the Official Journal of the European Union.
It shall apply to the 2004/2005 marketing year.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 570/2005
amending Regulation (EC) No 118/2005 as regards the fixing of budgetary ceilings for direct payments to be granted under Article 71 of Council Regulation (EC) No 1782/2003
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1782/2003 of 29 September 2003 establishing common rules for direct support schemes under the common agricultural policy and establishing certain support schemes for farmers and amending Regulations (EEC) No 2019/93, (EC) No 1452/2001, (EC) No 1453/2001, (EC) No 1454/2001, (EC) No 1868/94, (EC) No 1251/1999, (EC) No 1254/1999, (EC) No 1673/2000, (EEC) No 2358/71 and (EC) No 2529/2001 [1], and in particular Article 71(2) thereof,
(1) Annex IV to Regulation (EC) No 118/2005 modifying Annex VIII to Council Regulation (EC) No 1782/2003 and establishing budgetary ceilings for partial or optional implementation of the Single Payment Scheme and annual financial envelopes for Single Area Payment Scheme provided for in that Regulation establishes, for the 2005 financial year, budgetary ceilings for direct payments to be granted under Article 71 of Regulation (EC) No 1782/2003.
(2) In calculating single payment entitlements France recently discovered a not inconsiderable disparity between the financial result using the individual physical data relating to the different direct payments during the reference period, which are used to establish the reference amounts, and the data which had been communicated by France and used to establish the budgetary ceilings for the various direct payments in Regulation (EC) No 118/2005.
(3) The budgetary ceilings applicable in France for the year 2005 for the direct payments fixed in Regulation (EC) No 118/2005 should therefore be amended.
(4) Regulation (EC) No 118/2005 should therefore be amended accordingly.
(5) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the Management Committee for Direct Payments,
Annex IV to Regulation (EC) No 118/2005 is hereby replaced by the Annex to this Regulation.
This Regulation shall enter into force on the day following that of its publication in the Official Journal of the European Union.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 571/2005
fixing the representative prices and the additional import duties for molasses in the sugar sector applicable from 15 April 2005
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1260/2001 of 19 June 2001 on the common organisation of the market in sugar [1], and in particular Article 24(4) thereof,
(1) Commission Regulation (EC) No 1422/95 of 23 June 1995 laying down detailed rules of application for imports of molasses in the sugar sector and amending Regulation (EEC) No 785/68 [2], stipulates that the cif import price for molasses established in accordance with Commission Regulation (EEC) No 785/68 [3], is to be considered the representative price. That price is fixed for the standard quality defined in Article 1 of Regulation (EEC) No 785/68.
(2) For the purpose of fixing the representative prices, account must be taken of all the information provided for in Article 3 of Regulation (EEC) No 785/68, except in the cases provided for in Article 4 of that Regulation and those prices should be fixed, where appropriate, in accordance with the method provided for in Article 7 of that Regulation.
(3) Prices not referring to the standard quality should be adjusted upwards or downwards, according to the quality of the molasses offered, in accordance with Article 6 of Regulation (EEC) No 785/68.
(4) Where there is a difference between the trigger price for the product concerned and the representative price, additional import duties should be fixed under the terms laid down in Article 3 of Regulation (EC) No 1422/95. Should the import duties be suspended pursuant to Article 5 of Regulation (EC) No 1422/95, specific amounts for these duties should be fixed.
(5) The representative prices and additional import duties for the products concerned should be fixed in accordance with Articles 1(2) and 3(1) of Regulation (EC) No 1422/95.
(6) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the Management Committee for Sugar,
The representative prices and the additional duties applying to imports of the products referred to in Article 1 of Regulation (EC) No 1422/95 are fixed in the Annex hereto.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 15 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 572/2005
fixing the export refunds on white sugar and raw sugar exported in its unaltered state
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1260/2001 of 19 June 2001 on the common organisation of the markets in the sugar sector [1], and in particular the second subparagraph of Article 27(5) thereof,
(1) Article 27 of Regulation (EC) No 1260/2001 provides that the difference between quotations or prices on the world market for the products listed in Article 1(1)(a) of that Regulation and prices for those products within the Community may be covered by an export refund.
(2) Regulation (EC) No 1260/2001 provides that when refunds on white and raw sugar, undenatured and exported in its unaltered state, are being fixed account must be taken of the situation on the Community and world markets in sugar and in particular of the price and cost factors set out in Article 28 of that Regulation. The same Article provides that the economic aspect of the proposed exports should also be taken into account.
(3) The refund on raw sugar must be fixed in respect of the standard quality. The latter is defined in Annex I, point II, to Regulation (EC) No 1260/2001. Furthermore, this refund should be fixed in accordance with Article 28(4) of that Regulation. Candy sugar is defined in Commission Regulation (EC) No 2135/95 of 7 September 1995 laying down detailed rules of application for the grant of export refunds in the sugar sector [2]. The refund thus calculated for sugar containing added flavouring or colouring matter must apply to their sucrose content and, accordingly, be fixed per 1 % of the said content.
(4) In special cases, the amount of the refund may be fixed by other legal instruments.
(5) The refund must be fixed every two weeks. It may be altered in the intervening period.
(6) The first subparagraph of Article 27(5) of Regulation (EC) No 1260/2001 provides that refunds on the products referred to in Article 1 of that Regulation may vary according to destination, where the world market situation or the specific requirements of certain markets make this necessary.
(7) The significant and rapid increase in preferential imports of sugar from the western Balkan countries since the start of 2001 and in exports of sugar to those countries from the Community seems to be highly artificial.
(8) To prevent any abuse through the re-import into the Community of sugar products in receipt of an export refund, no refund should be set for all the countries of the western Balkans for the products covered by this Regulation.
(9) In view of the above and of the present situation on the market in sugar, and in particular of the quotations or prices for sugar within the Community and on the world market, refunds should be set at the appropriate amounts.
(10) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the Management Committee for Sugar,
The export refunds on the products listed in Article 1(1)(a) of Regulation (EC) No 1260/2001, undenatured and exported in the natural state, are hereby fixed to the amounts shown in the Annex hereto.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 15 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 573/2005
fixing the maximum export refund for white sugar to certain third countries for the 23rd partial invitation to tender issued within the framework of the standing invitation to tender provided for in Regulation (EC) No 1327/2004
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1260/2001 of 19 June 2001 on the common organisation of the markets in the sugar sector [1] and in particular the second indent of Article 27(5) thereof,
(1) Commission Regulation (EC) No 1327/2004 of 19 July 2004 on a standing invitation to tender to determine levies and/or refunds on exports of white sugar [2], for the 2004/2005 marketing year, requires partial invitations to tender to be issued for the export of this sugar to certain third countries.
(2) Pursuant to Article 9(1) of Regulation (EC) No 1327/2004 a maximum export refund shall be fixed, as the case may be, account being taken in particular of the state and foreseeable development of the Community and world markets in sugar, for the partial invitation to tender in question.
(3) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the Management Committee for Sugar,
For the 23rd partial invitation to tender for white sugar issued pursuant to Regulation (EC) No 1327/2004 the maximum amount of the export refund shall be 39,991 EUR/100 kg.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 15 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 574/2005
fixing the export refunds on milk and milk products
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 of 17 May 1999 on the common organisation of the market in milk and milk products [1], and in particular Article 31(3) thereof,
(1) Article 31 of Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 provides that the difference between prices in international trade for the products listed in Article 1 of that Regulation and prices for those products within the Community may be covered by an export refund within the limits resulting from agreements concluded in accordance with Article 300 of the Treaty.
(2) Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 provides that when the refunds on the products listed in Article 1 of the abovementioned Regulation, exported in the natural state, are being fixed, account must be taken of:
- the existing situation and the future trend with regard to prices and availabilities of milk and milk products on the Community market and prices for milk and milk products in international trade,
- marketing costs and the most favourable transport charges from Community markets to ports or other points of export in the Community, as well as costs incurred in placing the goods on the market of the country of destination,
- the aims of the common organisation of the market in milk and milk products which are to ensure equilibrium and the natural development of prices and trade on this market,
- the limits resulting from agreements concluded in accordance with Article 300 of the Treaty, and
- the need to avoid disturbances on the Community market, and
- the economic aspect of the proposed exports.
(3) Article 31(5) of Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 provides that when prices within the Community are being determined account should be taken of the ruling prices which are most favourable for exportation, and that when prices in international trade are being determined particular account should be taken of:
(a) prices ruling on third-country markets;
(b) the most favourable prices in third countries of destination for third-country imports;
(c) producer prices recorded in exporting third countries, account being taken, where appropriate, of subsidies granted by those countries; and
(4) Article 31(3) of Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 provides that the world market situation or the specific requirements of certain markets may make it necessary to vary the refund on the products listed in Article 1 of the abovementioned Regulation according to destination.
(5) Article 31(3) of Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 provides that the list of products on which export refunds are granted and the amount of such refunds should be fixed at least once every four weeks; the amount of the refund may, however, remain at the same level for more than four weeks.
(7) Commission Regulation (EEC) No 896/84 [4] laid down additional provisions concerning the granting of refunds on the change from one milk year to another; those provisions provide for the possibility of varying refunds according to the date of manufacture of the products.
(8) For the calculation of the refund for processed cheese provision must be made where casein or caseinates are added for that quantity not to be taken into account.
(9) It follows from applying the rules set out above to the present situation on the market in milk and in particular to quotations or prices for milk products within the Community and on the world market that the refund should be as set out in the Annex to this Regulation.
(10) The Management Committee for Milk and Milk Products has not delivered an opinion within the time limit set by its chairman,
The export refunds referred to in Article 31 of Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 on products exported in the natural state shall be as set out in the Annex.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 15 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 575/2005
fixing the maximum export refund for butter in the framework of the standing invitation to tender provided for in Regulation (EC) No 581/2004
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 of 17 May 1999 on the common organisation of the market in milk and milk products [1], and in particular the third subparagraph of Article 31(3) thereof,
(1) Commission Regulation (EC) No 581/2004 of 26 March 2004 opening a standing invitation to tender for export refunds concerning certain types of butter [2] provides for a permanent tender.
(2) Pursuant to Article 5 of Commission Regulation (EC) No 580/2004 of 26 March 2004 establishing a tender procedure concerning export refunds for certain milk products [3] and following an examination of the tenders submitted in response to the invitation to tender, it is appropriate to fix a maximum export refund for the tendering period ending on 12 April 2005.
(3) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the Management Committee for Milk and Milk Products,
For the permanent tender opened by Regulation (EC) No 581/2004, for the tendering period ending on 12 April 2005, the maximum amount of refund for the products referred to in Article 1(1) of that Regulation shall be as shown in the Annex to this Regulation.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 15 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 576/2005
fixing the maximum export refund for skimmed milk powder in the framework of the standing invitation to tender provided for in Regulation (EC) No 582/2004
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 of 17 May 1999 on the common organisation of the market in milk and milk products [1], and in particular the third subparagraph of Article 31(3) thereof,
(1) Commission Regulation (EC) No 582/2004 of 26 March 2004 opening a standing invitation to tender for export refunds for skimmed milk powder [2] provides for a permanent tender.
(2) Pursuant to Article 5 of Commission Regulation (EC) No 580/2004 of 26 March 2004 establishing a tender procedure concerning export refunds for certain milk products [3] and following an examination of the tenders submitted in response to the invitation to tender, it is appropriate to fix a maximum export refund for the tendering period ending on 12 April 2005.
(3) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the Management Committee for Milk and Milk Products,
For the permanent tender opened by Regulation (EC) No 582/2004, for the tendering period ending on 12 April 2005, the maximum amount of refund for the product and destinations referred to in Article 1(1) of that Regulation shall be 31,00 EUR/100 kg.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 15 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 577/2005
fixing the maximum reduction in the duty on sorghum imported in connection with the invitation to tender issued in Regulation (EC) No 2275/2004
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1784/2003 of 29 September 2003 on the common organisation of the market in cereals [1], and in particular Article 12(1) thereof,
(1) An invitation to tender for the maximum reduction in the duty on sorghum imported into Spain from third countries was opened pursuant to Commission Regulation (EC) No 2275/2004 [2].
(2) Pursuant to Article 7 of Commission Regulation (EC) No 1839/95 [3], the Commission, acting under the procedure laid down in Article 25 of Regulation (EC) No 1784/2003, may decide to fix a maximum reduction in the import duty. In fixing this maximum the criteria provided for in Articles 6 and 7 of Regulation (EC) No 1839/95 must be taken into account. Whereas a contract is awarded to any tenderer whose tender is equal to or less than the maximum reduction in the duty.
(3) The application of the abovementioned criteria to the current market situation for the cereal in question results in the maximum reduction in the import duty being fixed at the amount specified in Article 1.
(4) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the Management Committee for Cereals,
For tenders notified from 8 to 14 April 2005, pursuant to the invitation to tender issued in Regulation (EC) No 2275/2004, the maximum reduction in the duty on sorghum imported shall be 19,85 EUR/t and be valid for a total maximum quantity of 14465 t.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 15 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 578/2005
fixing the maximum reduction in the duty on maize imported in connection with the invitation to tender issued in Regulation (EC) No 2277/2004
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1784/2003 of 29 September 2003 on the common organisation of the market in cereals [1], and in particular Article 12(1) thereof,
(1) An invitation to tender for the maximum reduction in the duty on maize imported into Spain from third countries was opened pursuant to Commission Regulation (EC) No 2277/2004 [2].
(2) Pursuant to Article 7 of Commission Regulation (EC) No 1839/95 [3] the Commission, acting under the procedure laid down in Article 25 of Regulation (EC) No 1784/2003, may decide to fix maximum reduction in the import duty. In fixing this maximum the criteria provided for in Articles 6 and 7 of Regulation (EC) No 1839/95 must be taken into account. A contract is awarded to any tenderer whose tender is equal to or less than the maximum reduction in the duty.
(3) The application of the abovementioned criteria to the current market situation for the cereal in question results in the maximum reduction in the import duty being fixed at the amount specified in Article 1.
(4) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the Management Committee for Cereals,
For tenders notified from 8 to 14 April 2005, pursuant to the invitation to tender issued in Regulation (EC) No 2277/2004, the maximum reduction in the duty on maize imported shall be 27,27 EUR/t and be valid for a total maximum quantity of 45000 t.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 15 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 579/2005
fixing the maximum reduction in the duty on maize imported in connection with the invitation to tender issued in Regulation (EC) No 487/2005
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1784/2003 of 29 September 2003 on the common organisation of the market in cereals [1], and in particular Article 12(1) thereof,
(1) An invitation to tender for the maximum reduction in the duty on maize imported into Portugal from third countries was opened pursuant to Commission Regulation (EC) No 487/2005 [2].
(2) Pursuant to Article 7 of Commission Regulation (EC) No 1839/95 [3], the Commission, acting under the procedure laid down in Article 25 of Regulation (EC) No 1784/2003, may decide to fix maximum reduction in the import duty. In fixing this maximum the criteria provided for in Articles 6 and 7 of Regulation (EC) No 1839/95 must be taken into account. A contract is awarded to any tenderer whose tender is equal to or less than the maximum reduction in the duty.
(3) The application of the abovementioned criteria to the current market situation for the cereal in question results in the maximum reduction in the import duty being fixed at the amount specified in Article 1.
(4) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the Management Committee for Cereals,
For tenders notified from 8 to 14 April 2005, pursuant to the invitation to tender issued in Regulation (EC) No 487/2005, the maximum reduction in the duty on maize imported shall be 26,36 EUR/t and be valid for a total maximum quantity of 45000 t.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 15 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 580/2005
amending Regulation (EC) No 206/2005 imposing definitive safeguard measures against imports of farmed salmon
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 3285/94 of 22 December 1994 on common rules for imports and repealing Regulation (EC) No 518/94 [1], and in particular Article 16 thereof,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 519/94 of 7 March 1994 on common rules for imports from certain third countries and repealing Regulations (EEC) No 1765/82, (EEC) No 1766/82 and (EEC) No 3420/83 [2], and in particular Article 15 thereof,
(1) On 4 February 2005, the Commission imposed definitive safeguard measures by Commission Regulation (EC) No 206/2005 [3] (the definitive Regulation). Persuant to its Article 2, the measures include the application of a minimum import price (MIP).
(2) In particular, Article 2(3) of the definitive Regualtion sets the level of the MIP applicable until 15 April 2005.
(3) Recital (112) of the definitive Regulation calls for an early review before the entry into force of the revised MIP, should this be warranted.
(4) In line with the provisions of recital 112, the Commission is currently conducting a monitoring of the market and the development of prices. At this stage, it has not yet been possible to reach a conclusion on the appropriateness of a definitive minimum import price. Under the circumstances, and in order to permit the Commission to come to a definitive conclusion, while at the same time not unduly disturbing the market, it is considered appropriate to prolong the phase-in period until 24 May 2005,
1. In Article 2(3) of Regulation (EC) No 206/2005, " 15 April 2005" shall be replaced by " 24 May 2005".
2. In Article 2(4) of Regulation (EC) No 206/2005, " 16 April 2005" shall be replaced by " 25 May 2005".
This Regulation shall enter into force on the day following that of its publication in the Official Journal of the European Union.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 581/2005
concerning tenders notified in response to the invitation to tender for the export of barley issued in Regulation (EC) No 1757/2004
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1784/2003 of 29 September 2003 on the common organisation of the market in cereals [1], and in particular Article 13(3) thereof,
(1) An invitation to tender for the refund for the export of barley to certain third countries was opened pursuant to Commission Regulation (EC) No 1757/2004 [2].
(2) Article 7 of Commission Regulation (EC) No 1501/95 of 29 June 1995 laying down certain detailed rules for the application of Council Regulation (EEC) No 1766/92 on the granting of export refunds on cereals and the measures to be taken in the event of disturbance on the market for cereals [3], and in particular Article 13(3) thereof,
(3) On the basis of the criteria laid down in Article 1 of Regulation (EC) No 1501/95, a maximum refund should not be fixed.
(4) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the Management Committee for Cereals,
No action shall be taken on the tenders notified from 8 to 14 April 2005 in response to the invitation to tender for the refund for the export of barley issued in Regulation (EC) No 1757/2004.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 15 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 582/2005
fixing the maximum export refund on common wheat in connection with the invitation to tender issued in Regulation (EC) No 115/2005
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1784/2003 of 29 September 2003 on the common organisation of the market in cereals [1], and in particular Article 13(3) thereof,
(1) An invitation to tender for the refund for the export of common wheat to certain third countries was opened pursuant to Commission Regulation (EC) No 115/2005 [2].
(2) In accordance with Article 7 of Commission Regulation (EC) No 1501/95 of 29 June 1995 laying down certain detailed rules for the application of Council Regulation (EEC) No 1766/92 on the granting of export refunds on cereals and the measures to be taken in the event of disturbance on the market for cereals [3], the Commission may, on the basis of the tenders notified, decide to fix a maximum export refund taking account of the criteria referred to in Article 1 of Regulation (EC) No 1501/95. In that case a contract is awarded to any tenderer whose bid is equal to or lower than the maximum refund.
(3) The application of the abovementioned criteria to the current market situation for the cereal in question results in the maximum export refund being fixed.
(4) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the Management Committee for Cereals,
For tenders notified on 8 to 14 April 2005, pursuant to the invitation to tender issued in Regulation (EC) No 115/2005, the maximum refund on exportation of common wheat shall be 2,00 EUR/t.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 15 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 583/2005
establishing the standard import values for determining the entry price of certain fruit and vegetables
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Commission Regulation (EC) No 3223/94 of 21 December 1994 on detailed rules for the application of the import arrangements for fruit and vegetables [1], and in particular Article 4(1) thereof,
(1) Regulation (EC) No 3223/94 lays down, pursuant to the outcome of the Uruguay Round multilateral trade negotiations, the criteria whereby the Commission fixes the standard values for imports from third countries, in respect of the products and periods stipulated in the Annex thereto.
(2) In compliance with the above criteria, the standard import values must be fixed at the levels set out in the Annex to this Regulation,
The standard import values referred to in Article 4 of Regulation (EC) No 3223/94 shall be fixed as indicated in the Annex hereto.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 16 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 584/2005
opening a standing invitation to tender for the resale on the internal market of paddy rice held by the French intervention agency
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1785/2003 of 29 September 2003 on the common organisation of the market in rice [1], and in particular Article 7(4) and (5) thereof,
(1) Commission Regulation (EEC) No 75/91 [2] lays down the procedures and conditions for the disposal of paddy rice held by intervention agencies.
(2) The French intervention agency has been storing a very significant quantity of paddy rice for a very long time. A standing invitation to tender should therefore be opened for the resale on the internal market of some 5000 tonnes of paddy rice held by that agency.
(3) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the Management Committee for Cereals,
Under the conditions laid down in Regulation (EC) No 75/91, the French intervention agency shall launch a standing invitation to tender for the resale on the internal market of the quantities of paddy rice held by it, as set out in the Annex to this Regulation.
1. The closing date for the submission of tenders in response to the first partial invitation to tender shall be 27 April 2005.
2. The closing date for the submission of tenders in response to the last partial invitation to tender shall be 29 June 2005.
3. Tenders must be lodged with the French intervention agency:
Fax: (33) 144 18 20 08.
As an exception to Article 19 of Regulation (EEC) No 75/91, the French intervention agency shall inform the Commission, no later than the Tuesday of the week following the closing date for the submission of tenders, of the quantity and average prices of the various lots sold, broken down by group where appropriate.
This Regulation shall enter into force on the third day following its publication in the Official Journal of the European Union.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 585/2005
opening a standing invitation to tender for the resale on the internal market of paddy rice held by the Italian intervention agency
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1785/2003 of 29 September 2003 on the common organisation of the market in rice [1], and in particular Article 7(4) and (5) thereof,
(1) Commission Regulation (EEC) No 75/91 [2] lays down the procedures and conditions for the disposal of paddy rice held by intervention agencies.
(2) The Italian intervention agency has been storing a very significant quantity of paddy rice for a very long time. A standing invitation to tender should therefore be opened for the resale on the internal market of some 30010 tonnes of paddy rice held by that agency.
(3) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the Management Committee for Cereals,
Under the conditions laid down in Regulation (EC) No 75/91, the Italian intervention agency shall launch a standing invitation to tender for the resale on the internal market of the quantities of paddy rice held by it, as set out in the Annex to this Regulation.
1. The closing date for the submission of tenders in response to the first partial invitation to tender shall be 27 April 2005.
2. The closing date for the submission of tenders in response to the last partial invitation to tender shall be 29 June 2005.
3. Tenders must be lodged with the Italian intervention agency:
Tel. (39) 02 885 51 11
Fax (39) 02 86 13 72
As an exception to Article 19 of Regulation (EEC) No 75/91, the Italian intervention agency shall inform the Commission, no later than the Tuesday of the week following the closing date for the submission of tenders, of the quantity and average prices of the various lots sold, broken down by group where appropriate.
This Regulation shall enter into force on the third day following its publication in the Official Journal of the European Union.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 586/2005
opening a standing invitation to tender for the resale on the internal market of paddy rice held by the Greek intervention agency
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1785/2003 of 29 September 2003 on the common organisation of the market in rice [1], and in particular Article 7(4) and (5) thereof,
(1) Commission Regulation (EEC) No 75/91 [2] lays down the procedures and conditions for the disposal of paddy rice held by intervention agencies.
(2) The Greek intervention agency has been storing a very significant quantity of paddy rice for a very long time. A standing invitation to tender should therefore be opened for the resale on the internal market of some 18000 tonnes of paddy rice held by that agency.
(3) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the Management Committee for Cereals,
Under the conditions laid down in Regulation (EEC) No 75/91, the Greek intervention agency shall launch a standing invitation to tender for the resale on the internal market of the quantities of paddy rice held by it, as set out in the Annex to this Regulation.
1. The closing date for the submission of tenders in response to the first partial invitation to tender shall be 27 April 2005.
2. The closing date for the submission of tenders in response to the last partial invitation to tender shall be 29 June 2005.
3. Tenders must be lodged with the Greek intervention agency:
Tel. (30-210) 212 48 46 and 212 47 88
Fax (30-210) 212 47 91.
As an exception to Article 19 of Regulation (EEC) No 75/91, the Greek intervention agency shall inform the Commission, no later than the Tuesday of the week following the closing date for the submission of tenders, of the quantity and average prices of the various lots sold, broken down by group where appropriate.
This Regulation shall enter into force on the third day following that of its publication in the Official Journal of the European Union.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 587/2005
opening a standing invitation to tender for the resale on the internal market of paddy rice held by the Spanish intervention agency
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1785/2003 of 29 September 2003 on the common organisation of the market in rice [1], and in particular Article 7(4) and (5) thereof,
(1) Commission Regulation (EEC) No 75/91 [2] lays down the procedures and conditions for the disposal of paddy rice held by intervention agencies.
(2) The Spanish intervention agency has been storing a very significant quantity of paddy rice for a very long time. A standing invitation to tender should therefore be opened for the resale on the internal market of some 25021 tonnes of paddy rice held by that agency.
(3) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the Management Committee for Cereals,
Under the conditions laid down in Regulation (EEC) No 75/91, the Spanish intervention agency shall launch a standing invitation to tender for the resale on the internal market of the quantities of paddy rice held by it, as set out in the Annex to this Regulation.
1. The closing date for the submission of tenders in response to the first partial invitation to tender shall be 27 April 2005.
2. The closing date for the submission of tenders in response to the last partial invitation to tender shall be 29 June 2005.
3. Tenders shall be lodged with the Spanish intervention agency:
Fondo Español de Garantia Agraria (FEGA)
Fax (34) 915 21 98 32 and (34) 915 22 43 87.
As an exception to Article 19 of Regulation (EEC) No 75/91, the Spanish intervention agency shall inform the Commission, no later than the Tuesday of the week following the closing date for the submission of tenders, of the quantity and average prices of the various lots sold, broken down by group where appropriate.
This Regulation shall enter into force on the third day following that of its publication in the Official Journal of the European Union.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 588/2005
amending Regulation (EC) No 1002/2004 accepting undertakings offered in connection with the anti-dumping proceeding concerning imports of potassium chloride originating in the Republic of Belarus, the Russian Federation or Ukraine
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 384/96 of 22 December 1995 on protection against dumped imports from countries not member of the European Communities [1] (the basic Regulation) and in particular Article 8 thereof,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 992/2004 [2] of 17 May 2004 amending Regulation (EEC) No 3068/92 imposing a definitive anti-dumping duty on imports of potassium chloride originating in Belarus, Russia or Ukraine and in particular Article 1 thereof,
After consulting the Advisory Committee,
(1) The Council, by Regulation (EEC) No 3068/92 [3], imposed a definitive anti-dumping duty on imports of potassium chloride originating, inter alia, in the Russian Federation ("Russia"). By Regulation (EC) No 969/2000 [4], the Council amended and extended the period of application of the measures originally imposed by Regulation (EEC) No 3068/92 on imports of potassium chloride originating, inter alia, in Russia.
(2) In March 2004, by means of a notice published in the Official Journal of the European Union [5], the Commission launched, on its own initiative, a partial interim review of the measures in force on imports of potassium chloride from, inter alia, Russia to examine whether they should be amended to take account of the enlargement of the European Union to 25 Member States (Enlargement).
(3) The results of that partial interim review showed that it was in the interests of the Community to provide for the temporary adaptation of the measures so as to avoid a sudden and excessively negative economic impact on importers and users in the 10 new Member States (EU10) immediately following Enlargement.
(4) The Council, by Regulation (EC) No 992/2004, authorised the Commission to accept undertaking offers respecting the conditions set out in recitals 27 to 32 of the same Regulation. On this basis, and pursuant to Articles 8, 11(3), 21 and 22(c) of the basic Regulation, the Commission, by Regulation (EC) No 1002/2004 [6], accepted undertaking offers from two exporting producers in Russia.
(5) In the case of one exporting producer, the Commission accepted a joint undertaking for imports of potassium chloride produced by JSC Uralkali, Berezniki, Russia and sold by a trading company, Fertexim Ltd, Limassol, Cyprus which acted as the exclusive distributor for JSC Uralkali’s sales to the Community.
(6) JSC Uralkali has informed the Commission that it would, henceforth, sell to the Community through a different company called Uralkali Trading SA, Geneva, Switzerland. To take account of this change, JSC Uralkali and Fertexim Ltd requested that the relevant provisions of Regulation (EC) No 1002/2004 accepting the joint undertaking be amended. To this end, JSC Uralkali and Uralkali Trading SA have jointly offered a revised undertaking.
(7) JSC Uralkali has also pointed out that the undertaking accepted by Regulation (EC) No 1002/2004 did not allow for direct sales from JSC Uralkali to the first independent customer in the Community. By the revised undertaking, JSC Uralkali also undertakes to respect the terms thereof for direct sales to the Community.
(8) The Commission has examined the undertaking offer. It was concluded that the revised undertaking fulfilled all the necessary criteria for acceptance laid down in Regulation (EC) No 992/2004, namely that: (i) the sales prices of the companies concerned would be at levels which significantly contribute to the elimination of injury; (ii) the companies would observe certain import volumes for sales to customers in the EU10; and (iii) they would also broadly respect their traditional selling patterns to individual customers in the EU10. It was also considered, as had been argued by JSC Uralkali, that the transfer of the trading activities of Fertexim Ltd to Uralkali Trading SA did not affect the workability of the undertaking nor, on the basis of information provided by the companies, its effective monitoring.
(9) Furthermore, the request for exemption of JSC Uralkali’s direct sales to the Community from the anti-dumping duties was considered to be acceptable as it is in line with normal practice to accept appropriate undertaking offers from producers which export directly to the Community.
(10) In light of the above, it was considered appropriate to amend the operative part of Regulation (EC) No 1002/2004 accordingly,
Article 1 of Regulation (EC) No 1002/2004 shall be amended as follows:
The undertakings offered by the exporting producers mentioned below, in connection with the anti-dumping proceeding concerning imports of potassium chloride originating in the Republic of Belarus and the Russian Federation are hereby accepted.
This Regulation shall enter into force on the day following that of its publication in the Official Journal of the European Union.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 589/2005
fixing the minimum selling prices for butter for the 161st individual invitation to tender under the standing invitation to tender provided for in Regulation (EC) No 2571/97
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 of 17 May 1999 on the common organisation of the market in milk and milk products [1], and in particular Article 10 thereof,
(1) The intervention agencies are, pursuant to Commission Regulation (EC) No 2571/97 of 15 December 1997 on the sale of butter at reduced prices and the granting of aid for cream, butter and concentrated butter for use in the manufacture of pastry products, ice-cream and other foodstuffs [2], to sell by invitation to tender certain quantities of butter from intervention stocks that they hold and to grant aid for cream, butter and concentrated butter. Article 18 of that Regulation stipulates that in the light of the tenders received in response to each individual invitation to tender a minimum selling price shall be fixed for butter and maximum aid shall be fixed for cream, butter and concentrated butter. It is further stipulated that the price or aid may vary according to the intended use of the butter, its fat content and the incorporation procedure, and that a decision may also be taken to make no award in response to the tenders submitted. The amount(s) of the processing securities must be fixed accordingly.
(2) The Management Committee for Milk and Milk Products has not delivered an opinion within the time limit set by its chairman,
The minimum selling prices of butter from intervention stocks and processing securities applying for the 161st individual invitation to tender, under the standing invitation to tender provided for in Regulation (EC) No 2571/97, shall be fixed as indicated in the Annex hereto.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 16 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 590/2005
fixing the maximum aid for cream, butter and concentrated butter for the 161st individual invitation to tender under the standing invitation to tender provided for in Regulation (EC) No 2571/97
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 of 17 May 1999 on the common organisation of the market in milk and milk products [1], and in particular Article 10 thereof,
(1) The intervention agencies are, pursuant to Commission Regulation (EC) No 2571/97 of 15 December 1997 on the sale of butter at reduced prices and the granting of aid for cream, butter and concentrated butter for use in the manufacture of pastry products, ice cream and other foodstuffs [2], to sell by invitation to tender certain quantities of butter of intervention stocks that they hold and to grant aid for cream, butter and concentrated butter. Article 18 of that Regulation stipulates that in the light of the tenders received in response to each individual invitation to tender a minimum selling price shall be fixed for butter and maximum aid shall be fixed for cream, butter and concentrated butter. It is further stipulated that the price or aid may vary according to the intended use of the butter, its fat content and the incorporation procedure, and that a decision may also be taken to make no award in response to the tenders submitted. The amount(s) of the processing securities must be fixed accordingly.
(2) The Management Committee for Milk and Milk Products has not delivered an opinion within the time limit set by its chairman,
The maximum aid and processing securities applying for the 161st individual invitation to tender, under the standing invitation to tender provided for in Regulation (EC) No 2571/97, shall be fixed as indicated in the Annex hereto.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 16 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 591/2005
fixing the maximum aid for concentrated butter for the 333rd special invitation to tender opened under the standing invitation to tender provided for in Regulation (EEC) No 429/90
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 of 17 May 1999 on the common organisation of the market in milk and milk products [1], and in particular Article 10 thereof,
(1) In accordance with Commission Regulation (EEC) No 429/90 of 20 February 1990 on the granting by invitation to tender of an aid for concentrated butter intended for direct consumption in the Community [2], the intervention agencies are opening a standing invitation to tender for the granting of aid for concentrated butter. Article 6 of that Regulation provides that in the light of the tenders received in response to each special invitation to tender, a maximum amount of aid is to be fixed for concentrated butter with a minimum fat content of 96 % or a decision is to be taken to make no award; the end-use security must be fixed accordingly.
(2) In the light of the tenders received, the maximum aid should be fixed at the level specified below and the end-use security determined accordingly.
(3) The Management Committee for Milk and Milk Products has not delivered an opinion within the time limit set by its chairman,
For the 333rd tender under the standing invitation to tender opened by Regulation (EEC) No 429/90 the maximum aid and the end-use security are fixed as follows:
This Regulation shall enter into force on 16 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 592/2005
suspending the buying-in of butter in certain Member States
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 of 17 May 1999 on the common organisation of the market in milk and milk products [1],
Having regard to Commission Regulation (EC) No 2771/1999 of 16 December 1999 laying down detailed rules for the application of Council Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 as regards intervention on the market in butter and cream [2], and in particular Article 2 thereof,
(1) Article 2 of Regulation (EC) No 2771/1999 lays down that buying-in is to be opened or suspended by the Commission in a Member State, as appropriate, once it is observed that, for two weeks in succession, the market price in that Member State is below or equal to or above 92 % of the intervention price.
(2) Commission Regulation (EC) No 544/2005 [3] establishes the most recent list of Member States in which intervention is suspended. This list must be adjusted as a result of the market prices communicated by Sweden pursuant to Article 8 of Regulation (EC) No 2771/1999. In the interests of clarity, the list in question should be replaced and Regulation (EC) No 544/2005 should be repealed,
Buying-in of butter as provided for in Article 6(1) of Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 is hereby suspended in Belgium, Denmark, Cyprus, Hungary, Malta, Greece, Luxembourg, the Netherlands, Austria, Slovakia, Slovenia and Finland.
Regulation (EC) No 544/2005 is hereby repealed.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 16 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 593/2005
fixing the minimum selling price for butter for the 17th individual invitation to tender issued under the standing invitation to tender referred to in Regulation (EC) No 2771/1999
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 of 17 May 1999 on the common organisation of the market in milk and milk products [1], and in particular Article 10(c) thereof,
(1) Pursuant to Article 21 of Commission Regulation (EC) No 2771/1999 of 16 December 1999 laying down detailed rules for the application of Council Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 as regards intervention on the market in butter and cream [2], intervention agencies have put up for sale by standing invitation to tender certain quantities of butter held by them.
(2) In the light of the tenders received in response to each individual invitation to tender a minimum selling price shall be fixed or a decision shall be taken to make no award, in accordance with Article 24a of Regulation (EC) No 2771/1999.
(3) In the light of the tenders received, a minimum selling price should be fixed.
(4) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the Management Committee for Milk and Milk Products,
For the 17th individual invitation to tender pursuant to Regulation (EC) No 2771/1999, in respect of which the time limit for the submission of tenders expired on 12 April 2005, the minimum selling price for butter is fixed at 275 EUR/100 kg.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 16 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 594/2005
fixing the minimum selling price for skimmed-milk powder for the 16th individual invitation to tender issued under the standing invitation to tender referred to in Regulation (EC) No 214/2001
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 of 17 May 1999 on the common organisation of the market in milk and milk products [1], and in particular Article 10(c) thereof,
(1) Pursuant to Article 21 of Commission Regulation (EC) No 214/2001 of 12 January 2001 laying down detailed rules for the application of Council Regulation (EC) No 1255/1999 as regards intervention on the market in skimmed milk [2], intervention agencies have put up for sale by standing invitation to tender certain quantities of skimmed-milk powder held by them.
(2) In the light of the tenders received in response to each individual invitation to tender a minimum selling price shall be fixed or a decision shall be taken to make no award, in accordance with Article 24a of Regulation (EC) No 214/2001.
(3) In the light of the tenders received, a minimum selling price should be fixed.
(4) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the Management Committee for Milk and Milk Products,
For the 16th individual invitation to tender pursuant to Regulation (EC) No 214/2001, in respect of which the time limit for the submission of tenders expired on 12 April 2005, the minimum selling price for skimmed milk is fixed at 195,50 EUR/100 kg.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 16 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 595/2005
fixing the import duties in the cereals sector applicable from 16 April 2005
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1784/2003 of 29 September 2003 on the common organisation of the market in cereals [1],
Having regard to Commission Regulation (EC) No 1249/96 of 28 June 1996 laying down detailed rules for the application of Council Regulation (EEC) No 1766/92 as regards import duties in the cereals sector [2], and in particular Article 2(1) thereof,
(1) Article 10 of Regulation (EC) No 1784/2003 provides that the rates of duty in the Common Customs Tariff are to be charged on import of the products referred to in Article 1 of that Regulation. However, in the case of the products referred to in paragraph 2 of that Article, the import duty is to be equal to the intervention price valid for such products on importation and increased by 55 %, minus the cif import price applicable to the consignment in question. However, that duty may not exceed the rate of duty in the Common Customs Tariff.
(2) Pursuant to Article 10(3) of Regulation (EC) No 1784/2003, the cif import prices are calculated on the basis of the representative prices for the product in question on the world market.
(3) Regulation (EC) No 1249/96 lays down detailed rules for the application of Regulation (EC) No 1784/2003 as regards import duties in the cereals sector.
(4) The import duties are applicable until new duties are fixed and enter into force.
(5) In order to allow the import duty system to function normally, the representative market rates recorded during a reference period should be used for calculating the duties.
(6) Application of Regulation (EC) No 1249/96 results in import duties being fixed as set out in Annex I to this Regulation,
The import duties in the cereals sector referred to in Article 10(2) of Regulation (EC) No 1784/2003 shall be those fixed in Annex I to this Regulation on the basis of the information given in Annex II.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 16 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 596/2005
on the issue of licences for the import of garlic in the quarter from 1 June to 31 August 2005
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 2200/96 of 28 October 1996 on the common organisation of the market in fruit and vegetables [1],
Having regard to Commission Regulation (EC) No 565/2002 of 2 April 2002 establishing the method for managing the tariff quotas and introducing a system of certificates of origin for garlic imported from third countries [2], and in particular Article 8(2) thereof,
(1) The quantities for which licence applications have been lodged by traditonal importers and by new importers on 11 and 12 April 2005, pursuant to Article 5(2) of Regulation (EC) No 565/2002 exceed the quantities available for products originating in China and all third countries other than China and Argentina.
(2) It is now necessary to establish the extent to which the licence applications sent to the Commission on 14 April 2005 can be met and to fix, for each category of importer and product origin, the dates until which the issue of certificates must be suspended,
Applications for import licences lodged pursuant to Article 3(1) of Regulation (EC) No 565/2002, on 11 and 12 April 2005 and sent to the Commission on 14 April 2005, shall be met at a percentage rate of the quantities applied for as set out in Annex I hereto.
For each category of importer and the origin involved, applications for import licences pursuant to Article 3(1) of Regulation (EC) No 565/2002 relating to the quarter from 1 June 2005 to 31 August 2005 and lodged after 12 April 2005 but before the date in Annex II hereto, shall be rejected.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 16 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 597/2005
establishing the standard import values for determining the entry price of certain fruit and vegetables
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Commission Regulation (EC) No 3223/94 of 21 December 1994 on detailed rules for the application of the import arrangements for fruit and vegetables [1], and in particular Article 4(1) thereof,
(1) Regulation (EC) No 3223/94 lays down, pursuant to the outcome of the Uruguay Round multilateral trade negotiations, the criteria whereby the Commission fixes the standard values for imports from third countries, in respect of the products and periods stipulated in the Annex thereto.
(2) In compliance with the above criteria, the standard import values must be fixed at the levels set out in the Annex to this Regulation,
The standard import values referred to in Article 4 of Regulation (EC) No 3223/94 shall be fixed as indicated in the Annex hereto.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 19 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 598/2005
concerning tenders submitted in response to the invitation to tender for the export to certain third countries of wholly milled and parboiled long grain rice B issued in Regulation (EC) No 2032/2004
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1785/2003 of 29 September 2003 on the common organisation of the market in rice [1], and in particular Article 14(3) thereof,
(1) An invitation to tender for the export refund on rice was issued pursuant to Commission Regulation (EC) No 2032/2004 [2].
(2) Article 5 of Commission Regulation (EEC) No 584/75 [3], allows the Commission to decide, in accordance with the procedure laid down in Article 26 of Regulation (EC) No 1785/2003 and on the basis of the tenders submitted, to make no award.
(3) On the basis of the criteria laid down in Article 14(4) of Regulation (EC) No 1785/2003 a maximum refund should not be fixed.
(4) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the Management Committee for Cereals,
No action shall be taken on the tenders submitted from 11 to 14 April 2005 in response to the invitation to tender for the export refund on wholly milled and parboiled long grain rice B to certain third countries issued in Regulation (EC) No 2032/2004.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 19 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 599/2005
concerning tenders submitted in response to the invitation to tender for the export to certain third countries of wholly milled and medium and long grain A rice issued in Regulation (EC) No 2031/2004
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1785/2003 of 29 September 2003 on the common organisation of the market in rice [1], and in particular Article 14(3) thereof,
(1) An invitation to tender for the export refund on rice was issued pursuant to Commission Regulation (EC) No 2031/2004 [2].
(2) Article 5 of Commission Regulation (EEC) No 584/75 [3], allows the Commission to decide, in accordance with the procedure laid down in Article 26(2) of Regulation (EC) No 1785/2003 and on the basis of the tenders submitted, to make no award.
(3) On the basis of the criteria laid down in Article 14(4) of Regulation (EC) No 1785/2003, a maximum refund should not be fixed.
(4) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the Management Committee for Cereals,
No action shall be taken on the tenders submitted from 11 to 14 April 2005 in response to the invitation to tender for the export refund on wholly milled rand, medium and long grain A rice to certain third European countries issued in Regulation (EC) No 2031/2004.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 19 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 600/2005
concerning a new authorisation for 10 years of a coccidiostat as an additive in feedingstuffs, the provisional authorisation of an additive and the permanent authorisation of certain additives in feedingstuffs
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Directive 70/524/EEC of 23 November 1970 concerning additives in feedingstuffs [1], and in particular Articles 3, 9d(1) and 9e(1) thereof,
Having regard to Regulation (EC) No 1831/2003 of the European Parliament and of the Council of 22 September 2003 on additives for use in animal nutrition [2] and in particular Article 25 thereof,
(1) Regulation (EC) No 1831/2003 provides for the authorisation of additives for use in animal nutrition.
(2) Article 25 of Regulation (EC) No 1831/2003 lays down transitional measures for applications for the authorisation of feed additives submitted in accordance with Directive 70/524/EEC before the date of application of Regulation (EC) No 1831/2003.
(3) The applications for authorisation of the additives listed in the Annexes to this Regulation were submitted before the date of application of Regulation (EC) No 1831/2003.
(4) Initial comments on those applications, as provided for in Article 4(4) of Directive 70/524/EEC, were forwarded to the Commission before the date of application of Regulation (EC) No 1831/2003. Those applications are therefore to continue to be treated in accordance with Article 4 of Directive 70/524/EEC.
(5) The person responsible for putting into circulation Salinomax 120G submitted an application for authorisation for 10 years, as a coccidiostat for chickens for fattening, according to Article 4 of that Directive. The European Food Safety Authority (EFSA) has delivered an opinion on the safety of the use of this preparation for humans, animals and the environment, under the conditions set out in Annex I to this Regulation. The assessment shows that the conditions laid down in Article 3a of Directive 70/524/EEC for such authorisation are satisfied. Accordingly, the use of this preparation, as specified in Annex I, should be authorised for 10 years.
(6) Data were submitted in support of an application of the new additive Lactobacillus acidophilus DSM 13241 for dogs and cats. The EFSA delivered favourable opinions on 15 April 2004 and 27 October 2004 on the safety for the target animals, the user and the environment. The assessment shows that the conditions laid down in Article 9e(1) of Directive 70/524/EEC for such authorisation are satisfied. Accordingly, the use of that micro-organism preparation, as specified in Annex II, should be provisionally authorised.
(7) The use of the micro-organism preparation Enterococcus faecium ATCC 53519 and Enterococcus faecium ATCC 55593 was provisionally authorised, for the first time, for chickens for fattening by Commission Regulation (EC) No 1436/98 [3]. New data were submitted in support of an application for authorisation without time limit of that micro-organism preparation. The assessment shows that the conditions laid down in Article 3a of Directive 70/524/EEC for such authorisation are satisfied. Accordingly, the use of that micro-organism preparation, as specified in Annex III, should be authorised without a time limit.
(8) The use of the micro-organism preparation Bacillus licheniformis DSM 5749 and Bacillus subtilis DSM 5750 was provisionally authorised, for the first time, for turkeys for fattening by Commission Regulation (EC) No 2437/2000 [4] and for calves by Commission Regulation (EC) No 418/2001 [5]. New data were submitted in support of an application for authorisation without time limit of that micro-organism preparation. The assessment shows that the conditions laid down in Article 3a of Directive 70/524/EEC for such authorisation are satisfied. Accordingly, the use of that micro-organism preparation, as specified in Annex III, should be authorised without a time limit.
(9) The use of the micro-organism preparation Saccharomyces cerevisiae NCYC Sc 47 was provisionally authorised, for the first time, for rabbits by the Regulation (EC) No 1436/98. New data were submitted in support of an application for authorisation without time limit of that micro-organism preparation. The assessment shows that the conditions laid down in Article 3a of Directive 70/524/EEC for such authorisation are satisfied. Accordingly, the use of that micro-organism preparation, as specified in Annex III, should be authorised without a time limit.
(10) The assessment of this application shows that certain procedures should be required to protect workers from exposure to the additive set out in the Annex. Such protection should be assured by the application of Council Directive 89/391/EEC of 12 June 1989 on the introduction of measures to encourage improvements in the safety and health of workers at work [6].
(11) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the Standing Committee on the Food Chain and Animal Health,
The preparation belonging to the group "Coccidiostats and other medicinal substances", as specified in Annex I, is authorised for use for 10 years as additive in animal nutrition under the conditions laid down in that Annex.
The preparation belonging to the group "Micro-organisms", as specified in Annex II, is authorised provisionally for four years as an additive in animal nutrition under the conditions laid down in that Annex.
The preparations belonging to the group "Micro-organisms", as specified in Annex III, are authorised for use without a time limit as additives in animal nutrition under the conditions laid down in that Annex.
This Regulation shall enter into force on the third day following that of its publication in the Official Journal of the European Union.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 601/2005
amending Annex I to Council Regulation (EC) No 866/2004 on a regime under Article 2 of Protocol No 10 to the Act of Accession
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Protocol No 10 on Cyprus to the Act concerning the conditions of accession of the Czech Republic, the Republic of Estonia, the Republic of Cyprus, the Republic of Latvia, the Republic of Lithuania, the Republic of Hungary, the Republic of Malta, the Republic of Poland, the Republic of Slovenia and the Slovak Republic and the adjustments to the Treaties on which the European Union is founded [1],
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 866/2004 of 29 April 2004 on a regime under Article 2 of Protocol No 10 to the Act of Accession [2], and in particular Article 9 thereof,
(1) Annex I to Regulation (EC) No 866/2004 lays down a list of crossing points at which persons and goods may cross the line between the areas under the effective control of the Government of the Republic of Cyprus and those areas in which the Government of the Republic of Cyprus does not exercise effective control.
(2) Following agreement on the opening of new crossing points in Zodia and Ledra Street, it is necessary to adapt Annex I.
(3) The Government of the Republic of Cyprus gave its agreement to this adaptation.
(4) The Turkish Cypriot Chamber of Commerce was consulted on this matter,
Annex I to Regulation (EC) No 866/2004 is replaced by the following:
This Regulation shall enter into force on the third day following its publication in the Official Journal of the European Union.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 602/2005
on import licences in respect of beef and veal products originating in Botswana, Kenya, Madagascar, Swaziland, Zimbabwe and Namibia
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1254/1999 of 17 May 1999 on the common organisation of the market in beef and veal [1],
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 2286/2002 of 10 December 2002 on the arrangements applicable to agricultural products and goods resulting from the processing of agricultural products originating in the African, Caribbean and Pacific States (ACP States) and repealing Regulation (EC) No 1706/98 [2],
Having regard to Commission Regulation (EC) No 2247/2003 of 19 December 2003 laying down detailed rules for the application in the beef and veal sector of Council Regulation (EC) No 2286/2002 on the arrangements applicable to agricultural products and certain goods resulting from the processing of agricultural products originating in the African, Caribbean and Pacific States (ACP States) [3], and in particular Article 5 thereof,
(1) Article 1 of Regulation (EC) No 2247/2003 provides for the possibility of issuing import licences for beef and veal products originating in Botswana, Kenya, Madagascar, Swaziland, Zimbabwe and Namibia. However, imports must take place within the limits of the quantities specified for each of these exporting non-member countries.
(2) The applications for import licences submitted between 1 and 10 April 2005, expressed in terms of boned meat, in accordance with Regulation (EC) No 2247/2003, do not exceed, in respect of products originating from Botswana, Kenya, Madagascar, Swaziland, Zimbabwe and Namibia, the quantities available from those States. It is therefore possible to issue import licences in respect of the quantities applied for.
(3) The quantities in respect of which licences may be applied for from 1 May 2005 should be fixed within the scope of the total quantity of 52100 t.
(4) This Regulation is without prejudice to Council Directive 72/462/EEC of 12 December 1972 on health and veterinary inspection problems upon importation of bovine, ovine and caprine animals and swine, fresh meat or meat products from third countries [4],
The following Member States shall issue on 21 April 2005 import licences for beef and veal products, expressed as boned meat, originating in certain African, Caribbean and Pacific States, in respect of the following quantities and countries of origin:
- 750 t originating in Botswana,
- 650 t originating in Namibia;
- 500 t originating in Botswana,
- 350 t originating in Namibia.
Licence applications may be submitted, pursuant to Article 4(2) of Regulation (EC) No 2247/2003, during the first 10 days of May 2005 for the following quantities of boned beef and veal:
This Regulation shall enter into force on 21 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Council Regulation (EC) No 603/2005
amending the lists of insolvency proceedings, winding-up proceedings and liquidators in Annexes A, B and C to Regulation (EC) No 1346/2000 on insolvency proceedings
THE COUNCIL OF THE EUROPEAN UNION,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1346/2000 of 29 May 2000 on insolvency proceedings [1], and in particular Article 45 thereof,
Having regard to the proposal from the Commission,
(1) The Annexes to Regulation (EC) No 1346/2000 list the designations given in the national legislation of the Member States to the proceedings and liquidators to which that Regulation applies. Annex A to that Regulation lists the insolvency proceedings referred to in Article 2(a) of that Regulation. Annex B of that Regulation lists the winding-up proceedings referred to in Article 2(c) and Annex C of that Regulation lists the liquidators referred to in Article 2(b) of that Regulation.
(2) Annexes A, B and C to Regulation (EC) No 1346/2000 were amended by the 2003 Act of Accession so as to include the insolvency proceedings, the winding-up proceedings and the liquidators of the new Member States.
(3) Belgium, Spain, Italy, Latvia, Lithuania, Malta, Hungary, Austria, Poland, Portugal and the United Kingdom have notified the Commission, pursuant to Article 45 of Regulation (EC) No 1346/2000, of amendments to the lists set out in Annexes A, B and C to that Regulation.
(4) The United Kingdom and Ireland, in accordance with Article 3 of the Protocol on the position of the United Kingdom and Ireland annexed to the Treaty on European Union and the Treaty establishing the European Community, have given notice of their wish to take part in the adoption and application of this Regulation.
(5) Denmark, in accordance with Articles 1 and 2 of the Protocol on the position of Denmark annexed to the Treaty on European Union and the Treaty establishing the European Community, is not participating in the adoption of this Regulation, and is therefore not bound by it nor subject to its application.
(6) Regulation (EC) No 1346/2000 should therefore be amended accordingly,
2. Annex B is replaced by the text set out in Annex II to this Regulation;
3. Annex C is replaced by the text set out in Annex III to this Regulation.
This Regulation shall enter into force on the day following its publication in the Official Journal of the European Union.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in the Member States in accordance with the Treaty establishing the European Community.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 604/2005
establishing the standard import values for determining the entry price of certain fruit and vegetables
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Commission Regulation (EC) No 3223/94 of 21 December 1994 on detailed rules for the application of the import arrangements for fruit and vegetables [1], and in particular Article 4(1) thereof,
(1) Regulation (EC) No 3223/94 lays down, pursuant to the outcome of the Uruguay Round multilateral trade negotiations, the criteria whereby the Commission fixes the standard values for imports from third countries, in respect of the products and periods stipulated in the Annex thereto.
(2) In compliance with the above criteria, the standard import values must be fixed at the levels set out in the Annex to this Regulation,
The standard import values referred to in Article 4 of Regulation (EC) No 3223/94 shall be fixed as indicated in the Annex hereto.
This Regulation shall enter into force on 20 April 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 605/2005
amending Regulation (EC) No 296/96 on data to be transmitted by the Member States and the monthly booking of expenditure financed under the Guarantee Section of the European Agricultural Guidance and Guarantee Fund (EAGGF)
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1258/1999 of 17 May 1999 on the financing of the common agricultural policy [1], and in particular Articles 5(3) and 7(5) thereof,
(1) In accordance with Article 3 of Commission Regulation (EC) No 296/96 [2], the Commission is kept informed at regular intervals of expenditure incurred by the Member States. To avoid unnecessary notifications, provision should be made for this information to be sent every month without affecting the Member States' obligation to keep information drawn up on a weekly basis available to the Commission, so as to allow proper monitoring of expenditure.
(2) Some of the information to be sent by the Member States should be sent electronically in digital form to enable the Commission to use it directly for accounts management. However, forwarding by other means must continue to be possible in justified cases.
(3) To simplify and streamline administrative procedures, simultaneous forwarding of a copy of the information on paper should now only be required for the monthly summaries.
(4) In practice, indicating certain quantities and areas in the detailed declarations submitted by the Member States is of little value for the monthly advances. As a result, that information should no longer be required.
(5) Payments made by the Commission under the budget of the EAGGF Guarantee Section are exclusively in euro. The Member States may choose to make payments to beneficiaries in euro or in their national currency. However, the paying agencies of those Member States not participating in the euro making payments in national currency and in euro must keep separate accounts for the two currencies. To avoid converting these payments twice, the option of declaring amounts paid in euro in national currency should be abolished.
(6) Where, on the basis of the declarations of expenditure received from the Member States, the total amount of advance commitments which could be authorised under Article 150(3) of Council Regulation (EC, Euratom) No 1605/2002 of 25 June 2002 on the Financial Regulation applicable to the general budget of the European Communities [3] is more than half of all corresponding appropriations for the current financial year, the Commission is required to reduce those amounts. For the sake of sound management that reduction must be shared among all the Member States proportionally, on the basis of the declarations of expenditure received from them.
(7) If the Community budget has not been adopted by the beginning of the financial year, the second subparagraph of Article 13(2) of Regulation (EC, Euratom) No 1605/2002 provides that payments may be made monthly per chapter to a maximum of one twelfth of the allotted appropriations in the chapter in question of the preceding financial year. To allocate the available appropriations fairly among the Member States, provision should be made for advances to be granted in this case as a percentage, laid down for each chapter, of the declarations of expenditure submitted by each Member State and for the balance not used in a given month to be reallocated in Commission decisions on subsequent monthly payments.
(8) As part of the reform of the CAP and the introduction of the single farm payment scheme, Member State compliance with the payment deadlines is vital to the proper application of the rules on financial discipline. Specific rules should therefore be laid down to help avoid, wherever possible, any risk of the annual appropriations available in the Community budget being exceeded.
(9) For reasons of sound administration, where delays arise in sending supporting documents for payments made under Commission Regulation (EC) No 817/2004 of 29 April 2004 laying down detailed rules for the application of Council Regulation (EC) No 1257/1999 on support for rural development from the European Agricultural Guidance and Guarantee Fund (EAGGF) [4], it must be made possible for payments by the Commission to the Member State relating to September to be held over to the following month.
(10) Half of the expenditure relating to storage operations carried out in September is taken into account in respect of October and the balance in respect of November. To simplify management of the paying agencies' accounts, provision should be made for expenditure on these operations to be taken into account in full (100 %) in respect of October.
(11) Rural development expenditure part-financed by the Community budget and the national budgets is declared at the latest in respect of the second month following payment to the beneficiaries. To harmonise the accounting rules applied in the field of the EAGGF Guarantee Section, provision should be made for this expenditure to be declared in respect of the month in which the payments were made to the beneficiaries.
(12) Regulation (EC) No 296/96 should be amended accordingly.
(13) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the EAGGF Committee,
Regulation (EC) No 296/96 is hereby amended as follows:
1. Article 3 is amended as follows:
(a) paragraphs 1, 2 and 3 are replaced by the following:
"1. Member States shall collect and keep available for the Commission information on total expenditure effected each week.
No later than the third working day of each week, they shall make available information on total expenditure effected from the beginning of the month until the end of the preceding week.
Where the week runs over two months, no later than the third working day of the following month, Member States shall make available information on total expenditure effected during the preceding month.
2. Member States shall send information electronically on total expenditure effected for a given month and any information explaining any substantial difference between the estimates drawn up in accordance with paragraph 5 and expenditure actually incurred, by the third working day of the following month.
3. Not later than the 10th day of each month, Member States shall send to the Commission, electronically, details of total expenditure effected during the preceding month.
However, the information on expenditure effected between 1 and 15 October shall be forwarded by the 25th day of the same month at the latest.
3a. In justified cases the Commission may accept transmission of the information referred to in paragraphs 2 and 3 by other means.";
(b) paragraph 5 is replaced by the following:
"5. Not later than the 20th of each month, Member States shall transmit to the Commission, electronically, a set of documents permitting the booking to the Community budget of expenditure effected during the preceding month. However, the set of documents permitting the booking of expenditure effected between 1 and 15 October shall be submitted not later than 10 November.
The summary of the data referred to in paragraph 6(b) shall also be sent to the Commission on paper.";
(c) paragraph 6 is amended as follows:
(i) in point (a), the third indent is deleted;
(ii) point (b) is replaced by the following:
"(b) a summary of the data referred to in (a);"
(d) paragraph 9 is replaced by the following:
"9. The paying agencies of Member States not participating in the euro must maintain separate accounts according to the currency in which the payments have been made to the beneficiaries. The same separation must be maintained for the declarations made under the clearance of accounts procedure.";
2. Article 4 is amended as follows;
(a) paragraph 1 is replaced by the following:
"1. On the basis of data sent in accordance with Article 3, the Commission shall adopt decisions and make the monthly advances against booking of expenditure, without prejudice to the provisions of Article 14 of Council Regulation 2040/2000 [5].
If advance commitments in accordance with Article 150(3) of Council Regulation (EC, Euratom) No 1605/2002 [6] exceed one half of the total corresponding appropriations for the current financial year, the advances shall be granted as a percentage of the declarations of expenditure received from each Member State. The Commission shall take the balance of amounts not reimbursed to the Member States into account in decisions on subsequent reimbursements.
If the Community budget has not been adopted by the beginning of the financial year, the advances shall be granted as a percentage of the declarations of expenditure received from each Member State, laid down for each chapter of expenditure and within the limits laid down in Article 13 of Regulation (EC, Euratom) No 1605/2002. The Commission shall take the balance of amounts not reimbursed to the Member States into account in decisions on subsequent reimbursements.
(b) paragraph 2 is replaced by the following:
"2. Advances against booking shall be reduced for expenditure effected after the deadlines laid down as follows:
(a) where expenditure effected after the deadlines is equal to 4 % or less of the expenditure effected before the deadlines, no reduction shall be made;
(b) above the threshold of 4 %, all further expenditure effected with a delay of up to:
- one month shall be reduced by 10 %,
- two months shall be reduced by 25 %,
- three months shall be reduced by 45 %,
- four months shall be reduced by 70 %,
- five months or more shall be reduced by 100 %;
(c) however, in the case of the direct payments referred to in Article 12 and Title III or, where applicable, Title IVa of Council Regulation (EC) No 1782/2003 [7] made in respect of year n, paid out after the deadlines laid down and after 15 October of year n+1, the following conditions shall apply:
- where the 4 % threshold referred to in point (a) has not been used in full for payments made no later than 15 October of year n+1 and the remainder of the threshold exceeds 2 %, that remainder shall be reduced to 2 %,
- in any case, payments made in the course of budget year n+2 and subsequent years shall be eligible for the Member State concerned only up to the level of its national ceiling as provided for in Annexes VIII or VIIIa or its annual financial envelope established in accordance with Article 143b(3) of Regulation (EC) No 1782/2003 for the year preceding that of the budget year during which the payment is made, where applicable plus the amounts relating to the dairy premium and additional payments provided for in Articles 95 and 96 and the additional amount of aid provided for in Article 12 of that Regulation, less the percentage provided for in Article 10 and corrected by the adjustment provided for in Article 11, taking account of Article 12a of that Regulation and the amounts set in Article 4 of Regulation (EC) No 188/2005 [8],
- above the thresholds referred to above, the expenditure concerned by this point shall be reduced by 100 %;
(d) the Commission shall apply a different time scale and/or lower reductions or none at all if exceptional management conditions are encountered for certain measures or if justified reasons are advanced by the Member States.
However, in the case of the payments referred to in point (c), the preceding sentence shall apply within the ceilings referred to in the second indent of point (c);
(e) the reductions referred to in this Article shall be made in accordance with the rules laid down in Article 14 of Regulation (EC) No 2040/2000.
(c) paragraph 6 is replaced by the following:
"6. Where the Commission does not receive the documents referred to in Article 55(1) of Commission Regulation (EC) No 817/2004 [9] by 30 September each year, it may, after notifying the Member State concerned, suspend payment of the advance relating to expenditure incurred in respect of September in accordance with that Regulation until the advance relating to expenditure for October.
3. Article 5(2) is replaced by the following:
"2. The amounts of expenditure referred to in paragraph 1 shall be entered in the accounts by the paying agencies during the month following that to which the operations refer. The operations to be covered in the accounts adopted at the end of each month shall be those occurring between the beginning of the financial year and the end of that month.
However, for operations carried out during September, the expenditure shall be entered in the accounts by the paying agencies not later than 15 October";
4. Article 7(1)(b) is deleted.
This Regulation shall enter into force on the twentieth day following that of its publication in the Official Journal of the European Union.
It shall apply from 16 October 2005, with the exception of Article 1(1)(d) and (4), which shall apply from 16 October 2006.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
Commission Regulation (EC) No 606/2005
amending Regulation (EC) No 795/2004 laying down detailed rules for the implementation of the single payment scheme provided for in Council Regulation (EC) No 1782/2003 establishing common rules for direct support schemes under the common agricultural policy and establishing certain support schemes for farmers
THE COMMISSION OF THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITIES,
Having regard to the Treaty establishing the European Community,
Having regard to Council Regulation (EC) No 1782/2003 of 29 September 2003 establishing common rules for direct support schemes under the common agricultural policy and establishing certain support schemes for farmers and amending Regulations (EEC) No 2019/93, (EC) No 1452/2001, (EC) No 1453/2001, (EC) No 1454/2001, (EC) No 1868/94, (EC) No 1251/1999, (EC) No 1254/1999, (EC) No 1673/2000, (EEC) No 2358/71 and (EC) No 2529/2001 [1], and in particular the second subparagraph of Article 51(b) and Article 145(c) and (d) thereof,
(1) Commission Regulation (EC) No 795/2004 [2] introduces the implementing rules for the single payment scheme as from 2005. Experience of the administrative and operational implementation of that scheme at national level has shown that in certain respects further detailed rules are needed and in other respects the existing rules need to be clarified and adapted.
(2) Article 24(2) of Regulation (EC) No 795/2004 provides that the beginning of the 10 month period referred to in Article 44(3) of Regulation (EC) No 1782/2003 for each individual farmer is to be fixed by Member States at a single date within a period to be fixed between 1 September of the calendar year preceding the year of lodging an application under the single payment scheme and 30 April of the following calendar year or is to be left at the farmer’s choice within the fixed period. It is appropriate to allow farmers more flexibility for the fixing of the beginning of the 10 month period at the level of each parcel when specific agriculture conditions so warrant.
(3) Article 51 of Regulation (EC) No 1782/2003, as amended by Council Regulation (EC) No 864/2004 [3] and made applicable as from 1 January 2005 by Commission Regulation (EC) No 394/2005, authorises Member States to allow secondary crops to be cultivated on the eligible hectares during a period of maximum three months starting each year on 15 August. It is appropriate to bring forward that date to allow the growing of temporary vegetable crops in regions where cereals are usually harvested sooner for climatic reasons as communicated by the Member States concerned to the Commission.
(4) Regulation (EC) No 795/2004 should therefore be amended accordingly.
(5) Due to the fact that Regulation (EC) No 795/2004 applies as from 1 January 2005, it is appropriate that the provisions provided for in this Regulation apply retroactively from that date.
(6) The measures provided for in this Regulation are in accordance with the opinion of the Management Committee for Direct Payments,
Regulation (EC) No 795/2004 is amended as follows:
1. in Article 24(2) the following subparagraph is added:
"However, where specific agricultural conditions so warrant, Member States may authorise farmers to fix, within the fixed period referred to in the first subparagraph, two different dates for the beginning of the 10 month period in respect of their holding. Farmers who make use of this possibility shall indicate their choices in respect of each individual parcel in their single application form in addition to the information to be given by them in accordance with Article 12 of Regulation (EC) No 796/2004."
2. the following Article 28a is inserted:
Three months period provided for in Article 51(b) of Regulation (EC) No 1782/2003
The Member States indicated in the Annex are authorised to allow secondary crops to be cultivated on the eligible hectares during a period of maximum three months starting each year on the date laid down in that Annex for each Member State."
3. an Annex as set out in the Annex to this Regulation is added.
This Regulation shall enter into force on the day of its publication in the Official Journal of the European Union.
It shall apply from 1 January 2005.
This Regulation shall be binding in its entirety and directly applicable in all Member States.
